CIK: 1196298
Company Name: NEPHROS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2012-03-22
Accession Number: 0001144204-12-016613


Item 1 Business Reverse Stock Split On January 10, 2011, our stockholders voted to approve a 120 reverse stock split of our common stock. The reverse split became effective on March 11, 2011 All of the share and per share amounts discussed in this Annual Report on Form 10 K have been adjusted to reflect the effect of this reverse split. Overview Founded in 1997, we are a Delaware corporation that has been engaged primarily in the development of hemodiafiltration, or HDF, products and technologies for treating patients with End Stage Renal Disease, or ESRD. In January 2006, we introduced our Dual Stage Ultrafilter (the DSU ) water filtration system, which represented a new and complementary product line to our existing ESRD therapy business. We currently have 3 products in various stages of development in the HDF modality to deliver improved therapy to ESRD patients OLpur MDHDF filter series (which we sell in various countries in Europe and currently consists of our MD190 and MD220 diafilters); we believe that it is the only filter designed expressly for HDF therapy and employs our proprietary Mid Dilution Diafiltration technology; OLpur H2H, our add on module designed to allow the most common types of hemodialysis machines to be used for HDF therapy; OLpur NS2000 system, our stand al1 HDF machine and associated filter technology. We have also developed our OLpur HD 190 high flux dialyzer cartridge, which incorporates the same materials as our OLpur MD series but does not employ our proprietary Mid Dilution Diafiltration technology. Our OLpur HD190 was designed for use with either hemodialysis or hemodiafiltration machines, and received its approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, under Section 510(k) of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, or the FDC Act, in June 2005. OLpur and H2H are among our trademarks for which U.S. registrations are pending. H2H is a registered European Union trademark. We believe that products in our OLpur MDHDF filter series are more effective than any products currently available for ESRD therapy because they are better at removing certain larger toxins (known in the industry as middle molecules because of their heavier molecular weight) from blood. The accumulation of middle molecules in the blood has been related to such conditions as malnutrition, impaired cardiac function, carpal tunnel syndrome, and degenerative b1 disease in the ESRD patient. We also believe that OLpur H2H will, upon introduction, expand the use of HDF as a cost effective and attractive alternative for ESRD therapy. We believe that our products will reduce hospitalization, medication and care costs as well as improve patient health (including reduced drug requirements and improved blood pressure profiles), and therefore, quality of life, by removing a broad range of toxins through a more patient friendly, better tolerated process. In addition, independent studies in Europe have indicated that, when compared with dialysis as it is currently offered in the United States, HDF can reduce the patient mortality risk by up to 35%. We believe that the OLpur MDHDF filter series and the OLpur H2H will provide these benefits to ESRD patients at competitive costs and without the need for ESRD treatment providers to make significant capital expenditures in order to use our products. We also believe that the OLpur NS2000 system, if successfully developed, will be the most cost effective stand al1 hemodiafiltration system available. In the first quarter of 2007, we received approval from the FDA for our Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) application for the clinical evaluation of our OLp r H2H module and OLp r MD 220 filter. We completed the patient treatment phase of our clinical trial during the second quarter of 2008. We submitted our data to the FDA with our 510(k) application on these products in November 2008. Following its review of the application, the FDA requested additional information from us. We replied to the FDA inquiries on March 13, 2009. 4 On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system. On August 11, 2011, Nephros filed a new 510(k) application with the FDA for clearance of the Company s hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. On November 8, 2011 the Company received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. The Company provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. We believe that, if approved, our technology would be the first FDA approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The prior decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. On June 27, 2011, the Company entered into a license agreement, effective as of July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.1 as licensee, an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of Nephros patented mid dilution dialysis filters (MD 190, MD 220), referred to herein as the Products. Under the agreement, Nephros granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the Products under its own name, label and CE mark in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in the United Kingdom and Greece and, upon the written approval of Nephros, other European countries where Nephros does not sell the Products as well as non European countries, all such countries herein referred to as the Territory. In addition, if requested by Nephros, Bellco will be required to sell the Products to Nephros distributors in the Territory. We currently have multiple products in various stages of development for the ultrafiltration of water and other fluids DSU, our Dual Stage Ultrafilters for use in hospital infection control, hemodialysis, and other applications; SSU, our SafeSpout Ultrafilter for endpoint use on sinks; MSU, our large capacity Ultrafilter for commercial applications; and UF 40, our compact Ultrafilter for use in military applications and outdoor activities, such as hiking. In January 2006, we introduced our DSU water filtration system. Our DSU represents a new and complementary product line to our existing ESRD therapy business. The DSU incorporates our unique and proprietary dual stage filter architecture and is, to our knowledge, the only water filter that allows the user to sight verify that the filter is properly performing its cleansing function. Our research and development work on the OLpur H2H and MD Mid Dilution filter technologies for ESRD therapy provided the foundations for a proprietary multi stage water filter that we believe is cost effective, extremely reliable, and long lasting. We believe our DSU can offer a robust solution to a broad range of contaminated water and disease prevention issues. Hospitals are particularly stringent in their water quality requirements; transplant patients and other individuals whose immune systems are compromised can face a substantial infection risk in drinking or bathing with standard tap water that would generally not present a danger to individuals with normal immune function. The DSU is designed to remove a broad range of bacteria, viral agents and toxic substances, including salm1lla, hepatitis, cholera, HIV, Ebola virus, ricin toxin, legi1lla, fungi and e coli. With over 5,800 registered hospitals in the United States al1 (as reported by the American Hospital Association in Fast Facts of January 3, 2012), we believe the hospital shower and faucet market can offer us a valuable opportunity as a first step in water filtration. On July 1, 2009, we received FDA approval of the DSU to be used to filter biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. On May 10, 2011, we received approval from the Therapeutic Products Directorate of Health Canada, the Canadian health regulatory agency, to market our Dual Stage Ultrafilter (DSU) in Canada to filter out biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate solution used in hemodialysis procedures. The Association for the Advancement of Medical Instruments' (AAMI) adoption of more stringent water purity standards for dialysis applications as well as observational studies showing a significant reduction in required erythropoietin dosing when the Nephros DSU is utilized during dialysis therapy has significantly increased interest in the product. We have filed a special 510(k) application for our SSU and MSU filters to enable these products to be used in dialysis applications. We expect to realize accelerating product sales to the U.S. dialysis market as a combined result of these driving factors. We also expect to realize initial sales of DSU products to dialysis markets outside the U.S. in 2012 We have introduced product line extensions for the hospital infection control market which include a more durable filter design to withstand the higher pressures of hospital plumbing, filter covers to improve the aesthetics of the filters in hospital showers, and the SafeSpout Filter as a convenient endpoint filter to address acute outbreak scenarios. We are investigating a range of additional commercial, industrial, and military opportunities for our DSU technology. 5 In 2006, the U.S. Defense Department budget included an appropriation for the U.S. Marine Corps for development of a dual stage water ultra filter. In connection with this Federal appropriation of approximately $1 million, we worked on the development of a personal potable water purification system for use by warfighters. Work on this project was completed in August 2009 and we billed approximately $900,000 during the twenty months ended August 2009. In August 2009, we were awarded a new $18 million research contract from the Office of Naval Research (ONR) for continued development of a potable dual stage military water purifying filter. The research contract is an expansion of our former ONR contract and is being performed as part of the Marine Corps Advanced Technology Demonstration (ATD) project. The primary objective of this expanded research program is to select concepts and functional prototype filter pump units which were developed during the first phase of the project, and further develop them into smaller field testable devices that can be used for military evaluation purposes. An advantage of our ultrafilter is the removal of viruses which are not removed with commercially available off the shelf microfilter devices. Such devices generally rely on a secondary chemical disinfection step to make the water safe to drink. The expanded contract also includes research geared toward improving membrane performance, improving device durability, developing larger squad level water purifier devices, and investigating desalination filter pump devices for emergency use purposes. Approximately $1,723,000 of revenue has been recognized on this new project since September 2009 of which approximately $463,000 and $846,000 has been billed to this second project during the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively. During 2010, in response to a Request For Information (RFI) from the U.S. Army, we submitted its UF 40 ultrafilter for consideration as part of the standard issue hydration pack for soldiers in the field. We have been informed by the U.S. Army Public Health Command that its UF 40 filter has been validated to meet the military NSF P248 standard for emergency military operations as a microbiological water purifier. We believe that our UF 40 filter is the only stand al1 filter to date to have met the performance criteria of the NSF P248 standard without secondary disinfection steps. The Army has not to date issued a Request For Proposal (RFP), and we have no information regarding when or if an RFP applicable to the UF40 ultrafilter may be put forth by the U.S. Army. We have also introduced the DSU to various government agencies as a solution to providing potable water in certain emergency response situations. We have also begun investigating a range of commercial, industrial and retail opportunities for our DSU technology. In March 2010, we entered into a development agreement with STERIS Corporation to jointly develop filtration based products for medical device applications. We received an initial payment upon entering into the agreement of $40,000 and were eligible to receive additional payments upon successful completion of product development milest1s. During 2010, we completed the initial milest1 under the joint collaboration agreement with STERIS Corporation and completed the remaining milest1s under the agreement during the first 3 quarters of 2011 Completion of these milest1s resulted in aggregate payments to us of $100,000 during 2010, of which approximately $67,000 was recognized in 2010 and approximately $33,000 was recognized in 2011 The remaining milest1s, when completed, will result in additional payments of $60,000. On June 27, 2011, the Company entered into a license agreement, effective July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.1, as licensee, an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of Nephros patented mid dilution dialysis filters (MD 190, MD 220), referred to herein as the Products. Under the agreement, Nephros granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the Products under its own name, label and CE mark in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in the United Kingdom and Greece and, upon the written approval of Nephros, other European countries where Nephros does not sell the Products as well as non European countries, all such countries herein referred to as the Territory. In addition, if requested by Nephros, Bellco will be required to sell the Products to Nephros distributors in the Territory. In exchange for the rights granted to it under the agreement through December 31, 2014, Bellco agreed to pay Nephros installment payments of 500,000, 750,000, and 600,000 on July 1, 2011, January 15, 2012 and January 15, 2013, respectively. The first payment was received in July 2011 Such installment payments, herein referred to as the Installment Payments, are Bellco sole financial obligations through December 31, 2014. Beginning on January 1, 2015 through and including December 31, 2016, Bellco will pay to Nephros a royalty based on the number of units of Products sold in the Territory as follows for the first 103,000 units sold, Bellco will pay 4.50 per unit; thereafter, Bellco will pay 4.00 per unit. Bellco must meet minimum sales targets of 15,000 units in each quarter of 2015 and 2016. If Bellco fails to meet a quarterly minimum, the license in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada will, at the discretion of Nephros, convert to a non exclusive 1 All sums payable under the agreement will be paid in Euros, as adjusted to account for currency exchange fluctuations between the Euro and the U.S. dollar that occur between July 1, 2011, the effective date of the agreement, and the date of payment. In the case where Nephros desires to pursue a Change in Control transaction (as defined in the agreement), Bellco will have a 30 day right of first offer with respect to such acquisition, and where either party pursues a change in control transaction, it will require the acquirer to assume such party obligations under the agreement. 6 If there is an infringement of any of the patents underlying the Products, Nephros will have the first right to decide whether to act to protect such patents. Where Nephros decides not to act, Bellco, upon the written consent of Nephros, will be allowed to act to protect the patents and Nephros will reimburse Bellco the reasonable expenses sustained by Bellco as a credit against royalties due under the agreement. The term of the agreement is from July 1, 2011 through December 31, 2016, or until earlier terminated by either party as follows. Either party may terminate immediately after giving notice of a breach of any material obligation or upon the insolvency or bankruptcy of the other party, in each case that remains uncured after the expiration of a 30 day cure period. In addition, in the event the agreement is terminated by Bellco on or prior to December 31, 2014 due to a material breach by Nephros that causes any of the patents underlying the Products to lapse, Nephros will be required to reimburse Bellco any of the Installment Payments paid by Bellco prior to the date of termination. Finally, Nephros may terminate the agreement immediately for the following reasons Bellco failure to cure a m1tary default within 30 days of being provided notice of such default; in the event any required permit of Bellco expires, is not approved, is not issued, or is terminated, revoked, withdrawn or deactivated; and in respect of any calendar year commencing January 1, 2015, if aggregate royalties payable to Nephros fall below 270,000.The parties are subject to standard indemnification obligations. On June 27, 2011, Nephros issued a press release announcing its entry into the license agreement. The description of the license agreement set forth above is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the agreement, which is attached as Exhibit 10.62 to this report and is incorporated by reference. On July 21, 2011 the Company announced that it received 510(k) clearance from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to market its MSU and SSU ultrafilters to filter out biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate solution used in hemodialysis procedures. The Nephros DSU, MSU, and SSU are FDA cleared devices for the filtration of biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. Within the U.S., there are approximately 4,500 clinics providing over 50million dialysis treatments to 350,000 patients annually. To perform hemodialysis, ultrapure water is crucial to the production of dialysate. Dialysis clinics have water purification systems; however, microbial contaminants can originate from the water treatment system, the water distribution loop, or the dialysate concentrates. Nephros ultrafilters filter out substances down to the 0.005 micron level and address dialysate contamination at crucial points after the reverse osmosis module and at the dialysis machine entrance from the water distribution loop. Nephros ultrafilters can be used as the last step in the water purification process to ensure that ultrapure water is used for dialysis procedures. Regular use of Nephros ultrafilters offers an affordable safety measure when utilized with modern water treatment systems and optimally maintained hemodialysis machines. Recent data have shown that the Nephros DSU, when used as part of the water purification system for dialysis systems, may reduce the required dosage of erythropoietin stimulating agents, which we believe will provide a unique benefit to patients. On July 25, 2011, Nephros, Inc. entered into a letter agreement with DHR International, Inc., an international executive search firm, whereby DHR International will conduct a search to recruit a chief executive officer for Nephros. On July 26, 2011, Nephros issued a press release announcing, among other things, its entry into the letter agreement. Under the agreement, Nephros will pay DHR International a retainer consisting of $100,000 in cash and equity worth $25,000. The cash retainer is due in 3 equal installments. The first retainer payment was due and paid on execution of the agreement. The second retainer was due and paid when Nephros began the first round of interviews during the third quarter and the third retainer is due upon a candidate acceptance of an offer from Nephros. The stock portion of the retainer is in the form of an option for 20,000 shares of common stock with an exercise price of $125 per share, which was the closing price of our common stock on July 25, 2011 as reported on the Over the Counter Bulletin Board. The option is fully vested and has a term of 10 years. In addition to the payments discussed above, Nephros will reimburse DHR International for indirect out of pocket expenses related to the executive search, such as administrative, database management and reproduction costs, which are estimated to run 12% of the aggregate retainer, and are payable in 3 equal installments to be billed at the same time as the 3 retainer installments. Nephros also must reimburse DHR International for any direct out of pocket expenses, such as travel and lodging, which will be billed monthly as incurred. Nephros has paid DHR for all billed indirect and direct out of pocket expenses. In the event that Nephros hires a candidate provided by DHR International for any position other than chief executive officer, Nephros will be obligated to pay DHR International a fee equal to 33% of the individual projected first year total cash compensation. If Nephros hires a candidate presented by DHR International and that individual is terminated, either voluntarily or involuntarily, within 2 years from the hiring date, DHR International will, at Nephros request, refill the position for no additional fee. Nephros may cancel the agreement at any time. DHR International continues the search to recruit a chief executive officer for Nephros at this time. 7 On July 26, 2011, Nephros issued a press release that reported, among other things, the amount of revenue Nephros has received for the first six months of 2011 from the Office of Naval Research for work related to an advanced water purification system for military field use that Nephros is developing using its proprietary dual stage cold sterilization ultrafilter as the basis of the portable system. Nephros has generated approximately $463,000 and $846,000 of revenue during the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively, from its U.S. Defense Department project. On July 26, 2011, Nephros issued a press release that provided a corporate update on its operations and strategy. On August 11, 2011 Nephros submitted a new 510(k) application to market its leading edge hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. The application details Nephros OLpur MD220 diafilter and Nephros OLpur H 2 H Hemodiafiltration module. Nephros OLpur MD220 is a dialyzer designed expressly for HDF therapy that employs Nephros proprietary Mid Dilution diafiltration technology. Nephros OLpur H 2 H Hemodiafiltration module enables the most common types of standard dialysis machines to perform HDF therapy. On November 8, 2011 the Company received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. The Company provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. We believe that, if approved, our technology would be the first FDA approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The prior decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. Going Concern The accompanying financial statements have been prepared assuming that we will continue as a going concern. Our recurring losses and difficulty in generating sufficient cash flow to meet our obligations and sustain our operations raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. Our condensed consolidated interim financial statements do not include any adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty. We have incurred significant losses in operations in each quarter since inception. For the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010, we incurred net losses of $2,360,000 and $1,933,000, respectively. In addition, we have not generated positive cash flow from operations for the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010. To become profitable, we must increase revenue substantially and achieve and maintain positive gross and operating margins. If we are not able to increase revenue and gross and operating margins sufficiently to achieve profitability, our results of operations and financial condition will be materially and adversely affected. On October 1, 2010, we issued a senior secured note to Lambda Investors LLC, our largest stockholder, in the principal amount of $500,000. The note bore interest at the rate of 12% per annum and was to mature on April 1, 2011, at which time all principal and accrued interest was due. However, we agreed to and did prepay, without penalty, amounts due under the note with the cash proceeds from our rights offering prior to the maturity date. The note was secured by a first priority lien on all of our property, including our intellectual property. On March 10, 2011, we completed our rights offering and a private placement that together resulted in gross proceeds of approximately $32 million. The aggregate net proceeds were approximately $23 million, after deducting the estimated aggregate expenses of these transactions which approximated $200,000, the repayment of the $500,000 note issued to Lambda Investors, LLC, plus $26,650 of accrued interest thereon, the payment of an 8% sourcing transaction fee of $40,000 in respect of the note and an aggregate of $100,000 for reimbursement of Lambda Investors legal fees incurred in connection with the loan and the rights offering. After giving effect to the 120 reverse stock split on March 11, 2011, our stockholders subscribed for 4,964,854 units in the rights offering and we accepted all basic subscription rights and oversubscription privileges. The units were sold at a per unit purchase price of $0.40. Gross proceeds to us from the sale of these units in the rights offering were approximately $20 million. We issued an aggregate of 4,964,854 shares of common stock and warrants to purchase an aggregate of approximately 4,590,171 million shares of our common stock to stockholders who subscribed. Simultaneously with the closing of the rights offering, Lambda Investors, LLC purchased in a private placement 3,009,711 units at the same per unit purchase price of $0.40, pursuant to a purchase agreement between us and Lambda Investors. We issued to Lambda Investors an aggregate of 3,009,711 shares of common stock and warrants to purchase an aggregate of 2,782,577 shares of common stock. Of the $32 million in gross proceeds from the rights offering and the private placement, we received approximately $12 million in gross proceeds from the sale of units to Lambda Investors. We effected a reverse stock split, in which every 20 shares of our common stock issued and outstanding immediately prior to the effective time, which was 500 p.m. on March 11, 2011, were converted into 1 share of common stock. Fractional shares were not issued and stockholders who otherwise would have been entitled to receive a fractional share as a result of the reverse stock split received an amount in cash equal to $0.04 per pre split share for such fractional interests. The number of shares of common stock issued and outstanding was reduced from approximately 201,300,000 pre split to approximately 10,100,000 post split. The reverse stock split was effected in connection with the rights offering and private placement. 8 The reverse stock split was approved by our stockholders at the annual meeting held on January 10, 2011 The number of shares of common stock subject to outstanding stock warrants and options, and the exercise prices and conversion ratios of those securities, were automatically proportionately adjusted for the 1 for 20 ratio provided for by the reverse stock split. On June 27, 2011, we entered into a License Agreement, effective July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.l., as licensee ( Bellco ), an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of our patented mid dilution dialysis filters. This Agreement provides us with payments of 500,000, 750,000, and 600,000 on July 1, 2011, January 15, 2012 and January 15, 2013, respectively. The first 2 fixed payments have been received. The remaining fixed payment of 600,000 or approximately $778,000, will take place in January 2013 Beginning on January 1, 2015 through and including December 31, 2016, Bellco will pay to us a royalty based on the number of units of products sold per year in the territory as follows for the first 103,000 units sold, 4.50 per unit; thereafter, 4.00 per unit. Anticipated payments from this License Agreement will be a positive source of cash flow to the Company. There can be no assurance that the Company future cash flow will be sufficient to meet its obligations and commitments. If the Company is unable to generate sufficient cash flow from operations in the future to service its commitments the Company will be required to adopt alternatives, such as seeking to raise debt or equity capital, curtailing its planned activities or ceasing its operations. There can be no assurance that any such actions could be effected on a timely basis or on satisfactory terms or at all, or that these actions would enable the Company to continue to satisfy its capital requirements. Current ESRD Therapy Options Current renal replacement therapy technologies include (1) 2 types of dialysis, perit1al dialysis and hemodialysis, (2) hemofiltration and (3) hemodiafiltration, a combination of hemodialysis and hemofiltration. Dialysis can be broadly defined as the process that involves movement of molecules across a semipermeable membrane by diffusion. In hemodialysis, hemofiltration or hemodiafiltration, the blood is exposed to an artificial membrane outside of the body. During Perit1al Dialysis (PD), the exchange of molecules occurs across the membrane lining of the patient perit1al cavity. While there are variations in each approach, in general, the 3 major categories of renal replacement therapy in the marketplace today are defined as follows Dialysis o Perit1al Dialysis , or PD, uses the patient perit1um, the membrane lining covering the internal abdominal organs, as a filter by introducing injectable grade dialysate solution into the perit1al cavity through a surgically implanted catheter. After some period of time, the fluid is drained and replaced. PD is limited in use because the perit1al cavity is subject to scarring with repeated episodes of inflammation of the perit1al membrane, reducing the effectiveness of this treatment approach. With time, a PD patient kidney function continues to deteriorate and perit1al toxin removal al1 may become insufficient to provide adequate treatment. In such case the patient may switch to an extracorporeal renal replacement therapy such as hemodialysis or hemodiafiltration. o Hemodialysis uses an artificial kidney machine to remove certain toxins and fluid from the patient blood while controlling external blood flow and monitoring patient vital signs. Hemodialysis patients are connected to a dialysis machine via a vascular access device. The hemodialysis process occurs in a dialyzer cartridge with a semi permeable membrane which divides the dialyzer into 2 chambers while the blood is circulated through 1 chamber, a premixed solution known as dialysate circulates through the other chamber. Toxins and excess fluid from the blood cross the membrane into the dialysate solution through a process known as diffusion. Hemofiltration is a cleansing process without dialysate solution where blood is passed through a semi permeable membrane, which filters out solute particles through a process known as convection. 9 Hemodiafiltration, or HDF, in its basic form combines the principles of hemodialysis with hemofiltration. HDF uses dialysate solution with a negative pressure (similar to a vacuum effect) applied to the dialysate solution to draw additional toxins from the blood and across the membrane. This process is known as convection. HDF thus combines diffusion with convection, offering efficient removal of small solutes by diffusion, with improved removal of larger substances (i.e., middle molecules) by convection. Hemodialysis is the most common form of extracorporeal renal replacement therapy and is generally used in the United States. Hemodialysis fails, in our opinion, to address satisfactorily the long term health or overall quality of life of the ESRD patient. We believe that the HDF process, which is currently available in our Target European Market and Japan, offers improvement over other dialysis therapies because of better ESRD patient tolerance, superior blood purification of both small and middle molecules, and a substantially improved mortality risk profile. Current Dialyzer Technology used with HDF Systems In our view, treatment efficacy of current HDF systems is limited by current dialyzer technology. As a result of the negative pressure applied in HDF, fluid is drawn from the blood and across the dialyzer membrane along with the toxins removed from the blood. A portion of this fluid must be replaced with a man made injectable grade fluid, known as substitution fluid, in order to maintain the blood proper fluid volume. With the current dialyzer technology, fluid is replaced in 1 of 2 ways pre dilution or post dilution. With pre dilution, substitution fluid is added to the blood before the blood enters the dialyzer cartridge. In this process, the blood can be over diluted, and therefore more fluid can be drawn across the membrane. This enhances removal of toxins by convection. However, because the blood is diluted before entering the device, it actually reduces the rate of removal by diffusion; the overall rate of removal, therefore, is reduced for small molecular weight toxins (such as urea) that rely primarily on diffusive transport. With post dilution, substitution fluid is added to blood after the blood has exited the dialyzer cartridge. This is the currently preferred method because the concentration gradient is maintained at a higher level, thus not impairing the rate of removal of small toxins by diffusion. The disadvantage of this method, however, is that there is a limit in the amount of plasma water that can be filtered from the blood before the blood becomes too viscous, or thick. This limit is approximately 20% to 25% of the blood flow rate. This limit restricts the amount of convection, and therefore limits the removal of middle and larger molecules. The Nephros Mid Dilution Diafiltration Process Our OLpur MDHDF filter series uses a design and process we developed called Mid Dilution Diafiltration, or MDF. MDF is a fluid management system that we believe optimizes the removal of both small toxins and middle molecules by offering the advantages of pre dilution HDF and post dilution HDF combined in a single dialyzer cartridge. The MDF process involves the use of 2 stages in the first stage, blood is filtered against a dialysate solution, therefore providing post dilution hemodiafiltration; it is then overdiluted with sterile infusion fluid before entering a second stage, where it is filtered once again against a dialysate solution, therefore providing pre dilution diafiltration. We believe that the MDF process provides improved toxin removal in HDF treatments, with a resulting improvement in patient health and concurrent reduction in healthcare costs. Our ESRD Therapy Products Our products currently available or in development with respect to ESRD Therapy include OLpur MDHDF Filter Series OLpur MD190 and MD220 constitute our dialyzer cartridge series that incorporates the patented MDF process and is designed for use with existing HDF platforms currently prevalent in our Target European Market and Japan. Our MDHDF filter series incorporates a unique blood flow architecture that enhances toxin removal with essentially no cost increase over existing devices currently used for HDF therapy. Laboratory bench studies have been conducted on our OLpur MD190 by members of our research and development staff and by a third party. We completed our initial clinical studies to evaluate the efficacy of our OLpur MD190 as compared to conventional dialyzers in Montpellier, France in 2003 The results from this clinical study support our belief that OLpur MD190 is superior to post dilution hemodiafiltration using a standard high flux dialyzer with respect to 2 microglobulin clearance. In addition, clearances of urea, creatinine, and phosphate met the design specifications proposed for the OLpur MD190 device. Furthermore, adverse event data from the study suggest that hemodiafiltration with our OLpur MD190 device was well tolerated by the patients and safe. 10 We have completed a series of longer term clinical studies in the United Kingdom, France, Germany, Italy and Spain to further demonstrate the therapeutic benefits of our OLpur MDHDF filter series. A multi center study was started in March 2005. This study encompassed seven centers in France, five centers in Germany and 1 center in Sweden. Also commencing in 2005 were studies in the United Kingdom and in Italy. A 3 month study was conducted in Spain. All enrolled patients in the multi center and Spain studies completed the investigational period with the Nephros OLpur MDHDF filter devices. Data was very positive, demonstrating improved low molecular weight protein removal, improvements in appetite, an overall improved distribution of fluids and body composition, and optimal toxin removal and treatment tolerance for patients suffering from limited vascular access. Data was presented at the American Society of Nephrology meeting held in 2006, and the European Dialysis and Transplantation annual meetings held in 2007 and 2008. We contracted with T V Rheinland of North America, Inc., a worldwide testing and certification agency (also referred to as a notified body) that performs conformity assessments to European Union requirements for medical devices, to assist us in obtaining the Conformit Europ ene, or CE mark, a mark which demonstrates compliance with relevant European Union requirements. We received CE marking on the OLpur MD190 (which also covers other dialyzers in our MDHDF filter series), as well as certification of our overall quality system, on July 31, 2003 In the fourth quarter of 2006 we received CE marking on the DSU. During 2010, we replaced T V with BSI America, Inc. as our notified body. In November 2007, the Therapeutic Products Directorate of Health Canada, the Canadian health regulatory agency, approved our OLpur MDHDF filter series for marketing in Canada. We initiated marketing of our OLpur MD190 in our Target European Market in March 2004. We have established a sales presence in countries throughout our Target European Market, mainly through distributors, and we have developed marketing material in the relevant local languages. We also attend trade shows where we promote our product to several thousand people from the industry. Our OLpur MD220 is a newer product that we began selling in our Target European Market in 2006. The OLpur MD220 employs the same technology as our OLpur MD190, but contains a larger surface area of fiber. Because of its larger surface area, the OLpur MD220 may provide greater clearance of certain toxins than the OLpur MD190, and is suitable for patients of larger body mass. In the first quarter of 2007, we received approval from the FDA for our Investigational Device Exemption ( IDE ) application for the clinical evaluation of our OLp r H2H module and OLp r MD 220 filter. We completed the patient treatment phase of our clinical trial during the second quarter of 2008. We submitted our data to the FDA with our 510(k) application on these products in November 2008. Following its review of the application, the FDA requested additional information from us. We replied to the FDA inquiries on March 13, 2009. Because the FDA had not provided us with any additional requests for information or rendered a decision on our application, we made additional inquiries to the FDA about the status of our application and, as of March 10, 2010, were informed that our application was still under their review process. On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system. An in person meeting with the FDA took place on September 10, 2010, where the issues raised in the current FDA letter were discussed as well as the process for moving forward. We have engaged King & Spalding LLP as regulatory counsel to advise us in our interactions with the FDA. Another in person meeting with the FDA took place on April 20, 2011 to discuss a proposal for submission of a new 510(k) application for its on line HDF system. On August 11, 2011 Nephros submitted a new 510(k) application to market its hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. The application is subject to the FDA standard 90 day review period. The application details Nephros OLpur MD220 diafilter and Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module. Nephros OLpur MD220 is a dialyzer designed expressly for HDF therapy that employs Nephros proprietary Mid Dilution diafiltration technology. Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module is designed to enable the most common types of standard dialysis machines to perform HDF therapy. On November 8, 2011 the Company received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. The Company provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. Nephros believes that, if approved, its technology would be the first FDA approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The prior decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. 11 OLpur HD190 OLpur HD190 is our high flux dialyzer cartridge, designed for use with either hemodialysis or hemodiafiltration machines. The OLpur HD190 incorporates the same materials as our OLpur MD190, but lacks our proprietary mid dilution architecture. OLpur H 2 H OLpur H2H is our add on module that converts the most common types of hemodialysis machines that is, those with volumetric ultrafiltration control into HDF capable machines allowing them to use our OLpur MDHDF filter. We have completed our OLpur H2H design and laboratory bench testing, all of which were conducted by members of our research and development staff. Our design verification of the OLpur H2H was completed making the device ready for U.S. clinical trial. We completed the patient treatment phase of our clinical trial during the second quarter of 2008. We submitted our data to the FDA with our 510(k) application on these products in November 2008. Following its review of the application, the FDA requested additional information from us. We replied to the FDA inquiries on March 13, 2009. On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system. An in person meeting with the FDA took place on September 10, 2010, where the issues raised in the current FDA letter were discussed as well as the process for moving forward. We have engaged King & Spalding LLP as regulatory counsel to advise us in our interactions with the FDA. Another in person meeting with the FDA took place on April 20, 2011 to discuss a proposal for submission of a new 510(k) application for its on line HDF system. On August 11, 2011 Nephros submitted a new 510(k) application to market its hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. The application is subject to the FDA standard 90 day review period. The application details Nephros OLpur MD220 diafilter and Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module. Nephros OLpur MD220 is a dialyzer designed expressly for HDF therapy that employs Nephros proprietary Mid Dilution diafiltration technology. Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module is designed to enable the most common types of standard dialysis machines to perform HDF therapy. On November 8, 2011 the Nephros received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. Nephros provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. Nephros believes that, if approved, its technology would be the first approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The current decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. OLpur NS2000 OLpur NS2000 is our standal1 HDF machine and associated filter technology, which is in the development stage. The OLpur NS2000 will use a basic HDF platform which will incorporate our H2H technology including our proprietary substitution fluid systems. We have also designed and developed proprietary substitution fluid filter cartridges for use with the OLpur NS2000, which have been subjected to pre manufacturing testing. We will need to obtain the relevant regulatory clearances prior to any market introduction of our OLpur NS2000 in the United States. Our Water Filtration Product In January 2006, we introduced our Dual Stage Ultrafilter, or DSU, water filtration system. The DSU incorporates our unique and proprietary dual stage filter architecture. Our research and development work on the OLpur H2H and MD filter technologies for ESRD therapy provided the foundations for a proprietary multi stage water filter that we believe is cost effective, extremely reliable, and long lasting. We believe our DSU can offer a robust solution to various contaminated water and infection control issues. The DSU is designed to remove a broad range of bacteria, viral agents and toxic substances, including salm1lla, hepatitis, cholera, HIV, Ebola virus, ricin toxin, legi1lla, fungi and e coli. We believe our DSU offers four distinct advantages over competitors in the water filtration marketplace (1) the DSU is, to our knowledge, the only water filter that has the potential to provide the user with a simple sight verification that the filter is properly performing its cleansing function due to our unique dual stage architecture; (2) the DSU filters finer biological contaminants than other filters of which we are aware in the water filtration marketplace; (3) the DSU filters relatively large volumes of water before requiring replacement; and 12 (4) the DSU continues to protect the user even if the flow is reduced by contaminant volumes, because contaminants do not cross the filtration medium. With over 5,800 registered hospitals in the United States al1, we believe the hospital shower and faucet market can offer us a valuable opportunity as a first step in water filtration. We hope to gain a foothold at U.S. and European facilities that seek to become centers of excellence in infection control through the use of our DSU products. Due to the ongoing concerns of maintaining water quality, on October 7, 2008, we filed a 510(k) application for approval to market our DSU to dialysis clinics for in line purification of dialysate water. On July 1, 2009, we received FDA approval of the DSU to be used to filter biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. In 2006, the U.S. Defense Department budget included an appropriation for the U.S. Marine Corps for development of a dual stage water ultra filter. In connection with this Federal appropriation of approximately $1 million, we worked on the development of a personal potable water purification system for use by war fighters. Work on this project was completed in August 2009 and we have billed approximately $900,000 during the twenty months ended August 2009. In August 2009, we were awarded a new $18 million research contract from the Office of Naval Research (ONR) for development of a potable dual stage military water purifying filter. The research contract is an expansion of our former ONR contract which is being performed as part of the Marine Corps Advanced Technology Demonstration (ATD) project. The primary objective of this expanded research program is to select concepts and functional prototype filter pump units which were developed during the first phase of the project, and further develop them into smaller field testable devices that can be used for military evaluation purposes. An advantage of our ultrafilter is the removal of viruses which are not removed with commercially available off the shelf microfilter devices. Such devices generally rely on a secondary chemical disinfection step to make the water safe to drink. The expanded contract also includes research geared toward improving membrane performance, improving device durability, developing larger squad level water purifier devices, and investigating desalination filter pump devices for emergency use purposes. Approximately $463,000 and $846,000 has been billed to this project during the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively. Approximately $1,732,000 of revenue has been recognized on this $18 million project since its beginning in September 2009. During 2010, in response to a Request For Information (RFI) from the U.S. Army, Nephros submitted its UF 40 ultrafilter for consideration as part of the standard issue hydration pack for soldiers in the field. Nephros has been informed by the U.S. Army Public Health Command that its UF 40 filter has been validated to meet the military NSF P248 standard for emergency military operations as a microbiological water purifier. Nephros believes that its UF 40 filter is the only stand al1 filter to date to have met the performance criteria of the NSF P248 standard without secondary disinfection steps. The Army has not to date issued a Request For Proposal (RFP), and Nephros has no information regarding when or if an RFP applicable to the UF 40 ultrafilter may be put forth by the U.S. Army. In March 2010, we entered into a development agreement with STERIS Corporation to jointly develop filtration based products for medical device applications. We received an initial payment upon entering into the agreement of $40,000 and were eligible to receive additional payments upon successful completion of product development milest1s. During 2010, we completed the initial milest1 under the joint collaboration agreement with STERIS Corporation and completed the remaining milest1s under the agreement during the first 3 quarters of 2011 Completion of these milest1s resulted in aggregate payments to us of $100,000 during 2010, of which approximately $67,000 was recognized in 2010 and approximately $33,000 was recognized in 2011 The remaining milest1s, when completed, will result in additional payments of $60,000. The adoption by the Association for the Advancement of Medical Instruments, or AAMI, of more stringent water purity standards for dialysis applications as well as observational studies showing a significant reduction in required erythropoietin dosing when the Nephros DSU is utilized during dialysis therapy has significantly increased interest in the product. We have filed a special 510(k) application for our Small Sterile UltraFilter (also called the Safe Spout filter) and Mega Sterile UltraFilter to enable these products to be used in dialysis applications. We expect to realize accelerating product sales to the U.S. dialysis market as a combined result of these driving factors. We have also introduced the DSU to various government agencies as a solution to providing potable water in certain emergency response situations. We have also begun investigating a range of commercial, industrial and retail opportunities for our DSU technology. Our Strategy We believe that current mortality and morbidity statistics, in combination with quality of life issues faced by the ESRD patient, have generated demand for improved ESRD therapies. We also believe that our products and patented technology offer the ability to remove toxins more effectively than current dialysis therapy, in a cost framework competitive with currently available, less effective therapies. We also believe the recent changes resulting from the Medicare Improvements for Patients and Providers Act (MIPPA), which sets reimbursement for dialysis treatment costs, lab work and IV drugs into a single bundled rate, will have a positive impact toward the adoption of our products as they have the potential to reduce the amount of IV drugs being administered to dialysis patients. The following are some highlights of our current strategy 13 Showcase Product Efficacy in our Target European Market As of March 2004, we initiated marketing in our Target European Market for the OLpur MD220. There is an opportunity for sales of the OLpur MDHDF filters in our Target European Market because there is an established HDF machine base using disposable dialyzers. We have engaged in a series of clinical trials throughout our Target European Market to demonstrate the superior efficacy of our product. We believe that by demonstrating the effectiveness of our MDHDF filter series we will encourage more customers to purchase our products. Our MDHDF filter series has been applied successfully in over 200,000 treatments to date. Upgrade Fluid Quality feeding Hemodialysis Machines Promote use of our patented Dual Stage Ultrafilter (DSU), which has been cleared by the FDA for use in hemodialysis applications as a water and bicarbonate concentrate ultrafilter, as a means to achieve a lower overall treatment cost under the new bundled reimbursement system. Based on recent observations, we believe a dialysis clinic can lower costs of erythropoietin stimulating agents (ESA), such as Epogen (EPO), by simply installing DSU filters on the incoming water lines feeding their hemodialysis machines. Convert Existing Hemodialysis Machines to Hemodiafiltration We plan to complete our regulatory approval processes in the United States for both our OLpur MDHDF filter series and our OLpur H2H in 2012 If successfully approved, our OLpur H2H product will enable HDF therapy using the most common types of hemodialysis machines together with our OLpur MDHDF filters. Our goal is to achieve market penetration by offering the OLpur H2H for use by healthcare providers inexpensively, thus permitting the providers to use the OLpur H2H without a large initial capital outlay. We do not expect to generate significant positive margins from sales of OLpur H2H. We believe that, if approved in 2012, our OLpur H2H and MDHDF filters will be the first and only HDF therapy available in the United States at that time. Upgrade Dialysis Clinics to OLpur NS2000 We believe the introduction of the OLpur NS2000 to the market will represent a further upgrade in performance for dialysis clinics by offering a cost effective stand al1 HDF solution that incorporates the benefits of our OLpur H2H technology. We believe dialysis clinics will entertain OLpur NS2000 as an alternative to their current technology at such dialysis clinic machine replacement point. Develop a Foothold in the Healthcare Arena by Offering our DSU as a Means to Control Environment Acquired Infections We believe our DSU offers an effective, and cost effective, solution in conquering certain infection control issues faced by hospitals, nursing homes, assisted living facilities and other patient environments where chemical or heat alternatives have typically failed to adequately address the problem. The DSU provides for simple implementation without large capital expenses. Pursue our Military Product Development in Conjunction with Value Adding Partners For our military development, we are engaging with strategic allies who offer added value with respect to both new product and marketing opportunities. 1 of our goals in pursuing this project is to maintain and expand our new product development pipeline and achieve new products suitable for both military and domestic applications. Explore Complementary Product Opportunities Where appropriate, we are also seeking to leverage our technologies and expertise by applying them to new markets, such as currently being d1 under a development contract with STERIS Corporation. Our H2H has potential applications in acute patient care and controlled provision of ultrapure fluids in the field. Our DSU represents a new and complementary product line to our existing ESRD therapy business; we believe the Nephros DSU can offer a robust solution to a broad range of contaminated water and infection control issues. Manufacturing and Suppliers We do not, and do not intend to in the near future, manufacture any of our products and comp1nts. With regard to the OLpur MD190 and MD220, on June 27, 2011, we entered into a license agreement, effective July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.l., an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of our patented mid dilution dialysis filters (MD 190, MD 220), referred to herein as the Products. Under the agreement, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the Products under its own name, label and CE mark in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in the United Kingdom and Greece and, upon our written approval, other European countries where we do not sell the Products as well as non European countries, all such countries herein referred to as the Territory. In exchange for the rights granted to it under the Bellco license agreement through December 31, 2014, Bellco agreed to pay us installment payments of 500,000, 750,000, 600,000 on July 1, 2011, January 15, 2012 and January 15, 2013, respectively. Such installment payments, herein referred to as the Installment Payments, are Bellco sole financial obligations through December 31, 2014. Beginning on January 1, 2015 through and including December 31, 2016, Bellco will pay to us a royalty based on the number of units of Products sold per year in the Territory as follows for the first 103,000 units sold, Bellco will pay 4.50 per unit; thereafter, Bellco will pay 4.00 per unit. Bellco must meet minimum sales targets of 15,000 units in each quarter of 2015 and 2016. If Bellco fails to meet a quarterly minimum, the license in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada will, at our discretion, convert to a non exclusive 1 All sums payable under the agreement will be paid in Euros, as adjusted to account for currency exchange fluctuations between the Euro and the U.S. dollar that occur between July 1, 2011, the effective date of the agreement, and the date of payment. 14 A contract manufacturer produces the DSU product(s) as ordered. Sales and Marketing We have established a distributor ne2rk to sell ESRD products in our Target European Market and, when regulatory approval is obtained, intend to establish a similar arrangement in the United States. On February 25, 2010, we announced that we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Bellco Health Care Inc. ( BHC Medical ) to sell and market Nephros OLpurTM MD 220 filter for on line HDF therapy in Canada. Under the terms of the Agreement, Nephros and BHC Medical will work together to promote the sale and distribution of Nephros OLpurTM MD 220 filters through various advertising and promotional campaigns and by working with and training BHC sales and support staff. With regard to the OLpur MD190 and MD220, on June 27, 2011, we entered into a license agreement, effective July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.l., an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of our patented mid dilution dialysis filters (MD 190, MD 220), referred to herein as the Products. Under the agreement, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the Products under its own name, label and CE mark in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in the United Kingdom and Greece and, upon our written approval, other European countries where we do not sell the Products as well as non European countries, all such countries herein referred to as the Territory. In addition, if requested by us, Bellco will be required to sell the Products to our distributors in the Territory. In exchange for the rights granted to it under the Bellco license agreement through December 31, 2014, Bellco agreed to pay us installment payments of 500,000, 750,000, 600,000 on July 1, 2011, January 15, 2012 and January 15, 2013, respectively. Such installment payments, herein referred to as the Installment Payments, are Bellco sole financial obligations through December 31, 2014. Beginning on January 1, 2015 through and including December 31, 2016, Bellco will pay to us a royalty based on the number of units of Products sold per year in the Territory as follows for the first 103,000 units sold, Bellco will pay 4.50 per unit; thereafter, Bellco will pay 4.00 per unit. Bellco must meet minimum sales targets of 15,000 units in each quarter of 2015 and 2016. If Bellco fails to meet a quarterly minimum, the license in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada will, at our discretion, convert to a non exclusive 1 All sums payable under the agreement will be paid in Euros, as adjusted to account for currency exchange fluctuations between the Euro and the U.S. dollar that occur between July 1, 2011, the effective date of the agreement, and the date of payment. Our New Jersey office oversees sales and marketing activity of our DSU products. We are in discussions with several medical products and filtration products suppliers to act as non exclusive distributors of our DSU products to medical institutions. For each prospective market for our DSU products, we are pursuing alliance opportunities for joint product development and distribution. In July 2010, we announced a distribution agreement with AmeriWater Corporation and that AmeriWater had adopted the Nephros DSU as a standard comp1nt of its MRO portable reverse osmosis water treatment systems for dialysis. Our DSU manufacturer in Europe shares certain intellectual property rights with us for 1 of our DSU designs. Research and Development Our research and development efforts continue on several fronts directly related to our current product lines. We are also working on additional machine devices, next generation user interface enhancements and other product enhancements. In the area of water filtration, we have finalized our initial water filtration product line for the healthcare sector. In 2006, the U.S. Defense Department budget included an appropriation for the U.S. Marine Corps for development of a dual stage water ultra filter. In connection with this Federal appropriation of approximately $1 million, we worked on the development of a personal potable water purification system for use by warfighters. Work on this project was completed in August 2009 and we have billed approximately $900,000 during the twenty months ended August 2009. In August 2009, we were awarded a new $18 million research contract from the Office of Naval Research (ONR) for development of a potable dual stage military water purifying filter. The research contract is an expansion of our former ONR contract which is being performed as part of the Marine Corps Advanced Technology Demonstration (ATD) project. The primary objective of this expanded research program is to select concepts and functional prototype filter pump units which were developed during the first phase of the project, and further develop them into smaller field testable devices that can be used for military evaluation purposes. An advantage of our ultrafilter is the removal of viruses which are not removed with commercially available off the shelf microfilter devices. Such devices generally rely on a secondary chemical disinfection step to make the water safe to drink. The expanded contract also includes research geared toward improving membrane performance, improving device durability, developing larger squad level water purifier devices, and investigating desalination filter pump devices for emergency use purposes. Approximately $463,000 and $846,000 has been billed to this project during the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010, respectively. Approximately $1,732,000 of revenue has been recognized on this $18 million project since its beginning in September 2009. 15 During 2010, in response to a Request For Information (RFI) from the U.S. Army, Nephros submitted its UF 40 ultrafilter for consideration as part of the standard issue hydration pack for soldiers in the field. Nephros has been informed by the U.S. Army Public Health Command that its UF 40 filter has been validated to meet the military NSF P248 standard for emergency military operations as a microbiological water purifier. Nephros believes that its UF 40 filter is the only stand al1 filter to date to have met the performance criteria of the NSF P248 standard without secondary disinfection steps. The Army has not to date issued a Request For Proposal (RFP), and Nephros has no information regarding when or if an RFP applicable to the UF 40 ultrafilter may be put forth by the U.S. Army. We have also introduced the DSU to various government agencies as a solution to providing potable water in certain emergency response situations. We have also begun investigating a range of commercial, industrial and retail opportunities for our DSU technology. In March 2010, we entered into a development agreement with STERIS Corporation to jointly develop filtration based products for medical device applications. We received an initial payment upon entering into the agreement of $40,000 and were eligible to receive additional payments upon successful completion of product development milest1s. During 2010, we completed the initial milest1 under the joint collaboration agreement with STERIS Corporation and completed the remaining milest1s under the agreement during the first 3 quarters of 2011 Completion of these milest1s resulted in aggregate payments to us of $100,000 during 2010, of which approximately $67,000 was recognized in 2010 and approximately $33,000 was recognized in 2011 The remaining milest1s, when completed, will result in additional payments of $60,000. Our research and development expenditures were primarily related to development expenses associated with the H2H machine, STERIS development work and related salary expense for the years ended December 31, 2011 and 2010 and were $451,000 and $362,000, respectively. Competition The dialyzer and renal replacement therapy market is subject to intense competition. Accordingly, our future success will depend on our ability to meet the clinical needs of physicians and nephrologists, improve patient outcomes and remain cost effective for payers. We compete with other suppliers of ESRD therapies, supplies and services. These suppliers include Fresenius Medical Care AG, and Gambro AB, currently 2 of the primary machine manufacturers in hemodialysis. At present, Fresenius Medical Care AG and Gambro AB also manufacture HDF machines. The markets in which we sell our dialysis products are highly competitive. Our competitors in the sale of hemodialysis products include Gambro AB, Baxter International Inc., Asahi Kasei Medical Co. Ltd., Bellco S.p.A., a subsidiary of the Sorin group, B. Braun Melsungen AG, Nipro Corporation Ltd., Nikkiso Co., Ltd., Terumo Corporation and Toray Medical Co., Ltd. Other competitive considerations include pharmacological and technological advances in preventing the progression of ESRD in high risk patients such as those with diabetes and hypertension, technological developments by others in the area of dialysis, the development of new medications designed to reduce the incidence of kidney transplant rejection and progress in using kidneys harvested from genetically engineered animals as a source of transplants. We are not aware of any other companies using technology similar to ours in the treatment of ESRD. Our competition would increase, however, if companies that currently sell ESRD products, or new companies that enter the market, develop technology that is more efficient than ours. We believe that in order to become competitive in this market, we will need to develop and maintain competitive products and take and hold sufficient market share from our competitors. Therefore, we expect our methods of competing in the ESRD marketplace to include continuing our efforts to develop, have manufactured and sell products which, when compared to existing products, perform more efficiently and are available at prices that are acceptable to the market; displaying our products and providing associated literature at major industry trade shows in the United States; 16 initiating discussions with dialysis clinic medical directors, as well as representatives of dialysis clinical chains, to develop interest in our products; offering the OLpur H2H at a price that does not provide us with significant positive margins in order to encourage adoption of this product and associated demand for our dialyzers; pursuing alliance opportunities in certain territories for distribution of our products and possible alternative manufacturing facilities; and entering into license agreements similar to the Bellco S.r.l. agreement to expand market share. With respect to the water filtration market, we expect to compete with companies that are well entrenched in the water filtration domain. These companies include Pall Corporation, which manufactures end point water filtration systems, as well as CUNO (a 3M Company) and US Filter (a Siemens business). Our methods of competition in the water filtration domain include developing and marketing products that are designed to meet critical and specific customer needs more effectively than competitive devices; offering unique attributes that illustrate our product reliability, user friendliness, and performance capabilities; selling products to specific customer groups where our unique product attributes are mission critical; and pursuing alliance opportunities for joint product development and distribution. Intellectual Property Patents We protect our technology and products through patents and patent applications. In addition to the United States, we also applied for patents in other jurisdictions, such as the European Patent Office, Canada and Japan, to the extent we deem appropriate. We have built a portfolio of patents and applications covering our products, including their hardware design and methods of hemodiafiltration. We believe that our patent strategy will provide a competitive advantage in our target markets, but our patents may not be broad enough to cover our competitors products and may be subject to invalidation claims. Our U.S. patents for the Method and Apparatus for Efficient Hemodiafiltration and for the Dual Stage Filtration Cartridge, have claims that cover the OLpur MDHDF filter series and the method of hemodiafiltration employed in the operation of the products. Although there are pending applications with claims to the present embodiments of the OLpur H2H and the OLpur NS2000 products, these products are still in the development stage and we cannot determine if the applications (or the patents that we may issue on them) will also cover the ultimate commercial embodiment of these products. In addition, technological developments in ESRD therapy could reduce the value of our intellectual property. Any such reduction could be rapid and unanticipated. We have applied for patents on our DSU water filtration products to cover various applications in residential, commercial, and remote environments. As of December 31, 2011, we have sixteen issued U.S. patents; 1 issued Eurasian patent; five Mexican patents, four South Korean patents, 3 Russian patents, six Chinese patents, nine French patents, nine German patents, four Israeli patents, seven Italian patents, 3 Spanish patents, eight United Kingdom patents, eleven Japanese patents, 3 Hong Kong patents, ten Canadian patents, 1 Australian patent, and 1 patent in Brazil. Our issued U.S. patents expire between 2018 and 2026. In addition, we have four pending U.S. patent applications, four pending patent applications in Canada, five pending patent applications in the European Patent Office, four pending patent applications in Brazil, 2 pending patent applications in China, 1 pending patent application in Japan, 2 pending patent applications in Mexico, 1 pending patent application in South Korea, 2 pending patent applications in India, and four pending patent applications in Israel. Our pending patent applications relate to a range of dialysis technologies, including cartridge configurations, cartridge assembly, substitution fluid systems, and methods to enhance toxin removal. We also have pending patent applications on our DSU water filtration system, pump filter applications related to our Office of Naval Research project, and means to test filter integrity as part of a liquid purification system. 17 We have filed U.S. and International patent applications for a redundant ultra filtration device that was jointly invented by 1 of our employees and an employee of our contract manufacturer ( CM ). We and our CM are negotiating commercial arrangements pertaining to the invention and the patent applications. Trademarks As of December 31, 2011, we secured registrations of the trademarks CENTRAPUR, H2H, OLpur and the Arrows Logo in the European Union. Applications for these trademarks are pending registration in the United States. We also have applications for registration of a number of other marks pending in the United States Patent and Trademark Office. Governmental Regulation The research and development, manufacturing, promotion, marketing and distribution of our ESRD therapy products in the United States, our Target European Market and other regions of the world are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, including the FDA, the European Union and analogous agencies. United States The FDA regulates the manufacture and distribution of medical devices in the United States pursuant to the FDC Act. All of our ESRD therapy products are regulated in the United States as medical devices by the FDA under the FDC Act. Under the FDC Act, medical devices are classified in 1 of 3 classes, namely Class I, II or III, on the basis of the controls deemed necessary by the FDA to reasonably ensure their safety and effectiveness. Class I devices are medical devices for which general controls are deemed sufficient to ensure their safety and effectiveness. General controls include provisions related to (1) labeling, (2) producer registration, (3) defect notification, (4) records and reports and (5) quality service requirements, or QSR. Class II devices are medical devices for which the general controls for the Class I devices are deemed not sufficient to ensure their safety and effectiveness and require special controls in addition to the general controls. Special controls include provisions related to (1) performance and design standards, (2) post market surveillance, (3) patient registries and (4) the use of FDA guidelines. Class III devices are the most regulated medical devices and are generally limited to devices that support or sustain human life or are of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health or present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury. Pre market approval by the FDA is the required process of scientific review to ensure the safety and effectiveness of Class III devices. Before a new medical device can be introduced to the market, FDA clearance of a pre market notification under Section 510(k) of the FDC Act or FDA clearance of a pre market approval, or PMA, application under Section 515 of the FDC Act must be obtained. A Section 510(k) clearance will be granted if the submitted information establishes that the proposed device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed Class I or Class II medical device or to a Class III medical device for which the FDA has not called for pre market approval under Section 515. The Section 510(k) pre market clearance process is generally faster and simpler than the Section 515 pre market approval process. We understand that it generally takes four to 12 months from the date a Section 510(k) notification is accepted for filing to obtain Section 510(k) pre market clearance, (but has taken much longer in the case of our OLpur H2H module and OLpur MD 220 filter) and that it could take several years from the date a Section 515 application is accepted for filing to obtain Section 515 pre market approval, although it may take longer in both cases. We expect that all of our ESRD therapy products and our DSU will be categorized as Class II devices and that these products will not require clearance of pre market approval applications under Section 515 of the FDC Act, but will be eligible for marketing clearance through the pre market notification process under Section 510(k). We have determined that we are eligible to utilize the Section 510(k) pre market notification process based upon our ESRD therapy and DSU products substantial equivalence to previously legally marketed devices in the United States. However, we cannot assure you that we will not need to reevaluate the applicability of the Section 510(k) pre market notification process to our ESRD therapy and DSU products in the future; that the FDA will agree with our determination that we are eligible to use the Section 510(k) pre market notification process; or 18 that the FDA will not in the future require us to submit a Section 515 pre market approval application, which would be a more costly, lengthy and uncertain approval process. The FDA has recently been requiring a more rigorous demonstration of substantial equivalence than in the past and may request clinical data to support pre market clearance. As a result, the FDA could refuse to accept for filing a Section 510(k) notification made by us or request the submission of additional information. The FDA may determine that any 1 of our proposed ESRD therapy products is not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed device or that additional information is needed before a substantial equivalence determination can be made. A not substantially equivalent determination, or request for additional data, could prevent or delay the market introduction of our products that fall into this category, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on our potential sales and revenues. Moreover, even if the FDA does clear 1 or all of our products under the Section 510(k) process, it may clear a product for some procedures but not others or for certain classes of patients and not others. For any devices cleared through the Section 510(k) process, modifications or enhancements that could significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device or that constitute a major change to the intended use of the device will require a new Section 510(k) pre market notification submission. Accordingly, if we do obtain Section 510(k) pre market clearance for any of our ESRD therapy and DSU products, we will need to submit another Section 510(k) pre market notification if we significantly affect that product safety or effectiveness through subsequent modifications or enhancements. If human clinical trials of a device are required in connection with a Section 510(k) notification and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial (usually the manufacturer or distributor of the device) will need to file an IDE application prior to commencing human clinical trials. The IDE application must be supported by data, typically including the results of animal testing and or laboratory bench testing. If the IDE application is approved, human clinical trials may begin at a specific number of investigational sites with a specific number of patients, as specified in the IDE. Sponsors of clinical trials are permitted to sell those devices distributed in the course of the study provided such compensation does not exceed recovery of the costs of manufacture, research, development and handling. An IDE supplement must be submitted to the FDA before a sponsor or investigator may make a change to the investigational plan that may affect its scientific soundness or the rights, safety or welfare of subjects. We submitted our original IDE application to the FDA for our OLpur H2H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 filter in May 2006. The FDA answered our application with additional questions in June 2006, and we submitted responses to the FDA questions in December 2006. In January 2007, we received conditional approval for our IDE application from the FDA to begin human clinical trials of our OLpur H2H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 hemodiafilter. In March 2007, we received full approval on our IDE application from the FDA to begin human clinical trials of our OLpur H2H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 hemodiafilter. We completed the patient treatment phase of our clinical trials during the second quarter of 2008 and filed our 510(k) applications with respect to the OLpur MDHDF filter series and the OLpur H2H module in November 2008. No IDE was required for our DSU product. On July 1, 2009, we received FDA approval of the DSU to be used to filter biological contaminants from water and bicarbonate concentrate used in hemodialysis procedures. We hope to achieve U.S. regulatory approval of our OLp r H2H module and OLp r MD 220 filter products during 2012 Following its review of our OLpur MDHDF filter series and the OLpur H2H module applications, the FDA has requested additional information from us. We replied to the FDA inquiries on March 13, 2009. On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system. An in person meeting with the FDA took place on September 10, 2010, where the issues raised in the current FDA letter were discussed as well as the process for moving forward. We have engaged King & Spalding LLP as regulatory counsel to advise us in our interactions with the FDA. Another in person meeting with the FDA took place on April 20, 2011 to discuss a proposal for submission of a new 510(k) application for its on line HDF system. On August 11, 2011 Nephros submitted a new 510(k) application to market its hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. The application is subject to the FDA standard 90 day review period. The application details Nephros OLpur MD220 diafilter and Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module. Nephros OLpur MD220 is a dialyzer designed expressly for HDF therapy that employs Nephros proprietary Mid Dilution diafiltration technology. Nephros OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module is designed to enable the most common types of standard dialysis machines to perform HDF therapy. On November 8, 2011 the Company received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. The Company provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. The Company believes that, if approved, its technology would be the first FDA approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The prior decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. The Section 510(k) pre market clearance process can be lengthy and uncertain. It will require substantial commitments of our financial resources and management time and effort. Significant delays in this process could occur as a result of factors including our inability to timely raise sufficient funds; the FDA failure to schedule advisory review panels; 19 changes in established review guidelines; changes in regulations or administrative interpretations; or determinations by the FDA that clinical data collected is insufficient to support the safety and effectiveness of 1 or more of our products for their intended uses or that the data warrants the continuation of clinical studies. Delays in obtaining, or failure to obtain, requisite regulatory approvals or clearances in the United States for any of our products would prevent us from selling those products in the United States and would impair our ability to generate funds from sales of those products in the United States, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The FDC Act requires that medical devices be manufactured in accordance with the FDA current QSR regulations which require, among other things, that the design and manufacturing processes be regulated and controlled by the use of written procedures; the ability to produce medical devices which meet the manufacturer specifications be validated by extensive and detailed testing of every aspect of the process; any deficiencies in the manufacturing process or in the products produced be investigated; detailed records be kept and a corrective and preventative action plan be in place; and manufacturing facilities be subject to FDA inspection on a periodic basis to monitor compliance with QSR regulations. If violations of the applicable QSR regulations are noted during FDA inspections of our manufacturing facilities or the manufacturing facilities of our contract manufacturers, there may be a material adverse effect on our ability to produce and sell our products. Before the FDA approves a Section 510(k) pre market notification, the FDA is likely to inspect the relevant manufacturing facilities and processes to ensure their continued compliance with QSR. Although some of the manufacturing facilities and processes that we expect to use to manufacture our ESRD and DSU filters have been inspected and certified by a worldwide testing and certification agency (also referred to as a notified body) that performs conformity assessments to European Union requirements for medical devices, they have not all been inspected by the FDA. Similarly, although some of the facilities and processes that we expect to use to manufacture our OLpur H2H have been inspected by the FDA, they have not all been inspected by any notified body. A notified body is a group accredited and monitored by governmental agencies that inspects manufacturing facilities and quality control systems at regular intervals and is authorized to carry out unannounced inspections. Even after the FDA has cleared a Section 510(k) submission, it will periodically inspect the manufacturing facilities and processes for compliance with QSR. In addition, in the event that additional manufacturing sites are added or manufacturing processes are changed, such new facilities and processes are also subject to FDA inspection for compliance with QSR. The manufacturing facilities and processes that will be used to manufacture our products have not yet been inspected by the FDA for compliance with QSR. We cannot assure you that the facilities and processes used by us will be found to comply with QSR and there is a risk that clearance or approval will, therefore, be delayed by the FDA until such compliance is achieved. In addition to the requirements described above, the FDC Act requires that all medical device manufacturers and distributors register with the FDA annually and provide the FDA with a list of those medical devices which they distribute commercially; information be provided to the FDA on death or serious injuries alleged to have been associated with the use of the products, as well as product malfunctions that would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; and certain medical devices not cleared with the FDA for marketing in the United States meet specific requirements before they are exported. 20 European Union The European Union began to harmonize national regulations comprehensively for the control of medical devices in member nations in 1993, when it adopted its Medical Devices Directive 93 42 EEC. The European Union directive applies to both the manufacturer quality assurance system and the product technical design and discusses the various ways to obtain approval of a device (dependent on device classification), how to properly CE Mark a device and how to place a device on the market. We have subjected our entire business in our Target European Market to the most comprehensive procedural approach in order to demonstrate the quality standards and performance of our operations, which we believe is also the fastest way to launch a new product in the European Community. The regulatory approach necessary to demonstrate to the European Union that the organization has the ability to provide medical devices and related services that consistently meet customer requirements and regulatory requirements applicable to medical devices requires the certification of a full quality management system by a notified body. Initially, we engaged T V Rheinland of North America, Inc. ( T V Rheinland ) as the notified body to assist us in obtaining certification to the International Organization for Standardization, or ISO, 13485 2003 standard, which demonstrates the presence of a quality management system that can be used by an organization for design and development, production, installation and servicing of medical devices and the design, development and provision of related services. European Union requirements for products are set forth in harmonized European Union standards and include conformity to safety requirements, physical and biological properties, construction and environmental properties, and information supplied by the manufacturer. A company demonstrates conformity to these requirements, with respect to a product, by pre clinical tests, biocompatibility tests, qualification of products and packaging, risk analysis and well conducted clinical investigations approved by ethics committees. Once a manufacturer full quality management system is determined to be in compliance with ISO 13485 2003 and other statutory requirements, and the manufacturer products conform to harmonized European standards, the notified body will recommend and document such conformity. The manufacturer will receive a CE marking and ISO certifications, and then may place a CE mark on the relevant products. The CE mark, which stands for Conformit Europ enne, demonstrates compliance with the relevant European Union requirements. Products subject to these provisions that do not bear the CE mark cannot be imported to, or sold or distributed within, the European Union. In July 2003, we received a certification from T V Rheinland that our quality management system conforms to the requirements of the European Community. At the same time, T V Rheinland approved our use of the CE marking with respect to the design and production of high permeability hemodialyzer products for ESRD therapy. In April 2010, we changed our notified body from T V Rheinland to BSI America, Inc. and expanded our scope to include design and development and production of water filters. With regard to the OLpur MD190 and MD220, on June 27, 2011, we entered into a license agreement, effective July 1, 2011, with Bellco S.r.l., an Italy based supplier of hemodialysis and intensive care products, for the manufacturing, marketing and sale of our patented mid dilution dialysis filters (MD 190, MD 220), referred to herein as the Products. Under the agreement, we granted Bellco a license to manufacture, market and sell the Products under its own name, label and CE mark in Italy, France, Belgium, Spain and Canada on an exclusive basis, and to do the same on a non exclusive basis in the United Kingdom and Greece and, upon our written approval, other European countries where we do not sell the Products as well as non European countries, all such countries herein referred to as the Territory. In addition, if requested by us, Bellco will be required to sell the Products to our distributors in the Territory. Regulatory Authorities in Regions Outside of the United States and the European Union We also plan to sell our ESRD therapy products in foreign markets outside the United States which are not part of the European Union. Requirements pertaining to medical devices vary widely from country to country, ranging from no health regulations to detailed submissions such as those required by the FDA. We believe the extent and complexity of regulations for medical devices such as those produced by us are increasing worldwide. We anticipate that this trend will continue and that the cost and time required to obtain approval to market in any given country will increase, with no assurance that such approval will be obtained. Our ability to export into other countries may require compliance with ISO 13485, which is analogous to compliance with the FDA QSR requirements. In November 2007 and May 2011, the Therapeutic Products Directorate of Health Canada, the Canadian health regulatory agency, approved our OLpur MDHDF filter series and our Dual Stage Ultrafilter (DSU), respectively for marketing in Canada. Other than the CE marking and Canadian approval of our OLpur MDHDF filter and DSU products, we have not obtained any regulatory approvals to sell any of our products and there is no assurance that any such clearance or certification will be issued. 21 Reimbursement In both domestic markets and markets outside of the United States, sales of our ESRD therapy products will depend in part, on the availability of reimbursement from third party payers. In the United States, ESRD providers are reimbursed through Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers. In countries other than the United States, ESRD providers are also reimbursed through governmental and private insurers. In countries other than the United States, the pricing and profitability of our products generally will be subject to government controls. Despite the continually expanding influence of the European Union, national healthcare systems in its member nations, reimbursement decision making included, are neither regulated nor integrated at the European Union level. Each country has its own system, often closely protected by its corresponding national government. Product Liability and Insurance The production, marketing and sale of kidney dialysis products have an inherent risk of liability in the event of product failure or claim of harm caused by product operation. We have acquired product liability insurance for our products in the amount of $5 million. A successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage could materially deplete our assets. Moreover, any claim against us could generate negative publicity, which could decrease the demand for our products, our ability to generate revenues and our profitability. Some of our existing and potential agreements with manufacturers of our products and comp1nts of our products do or may require us (1) to obtain product liability insurance or (2) to indemnify manufacturers against liabilities resulting from the sale of our products. If we are not able to maintain adequate product liability insurance, we will be in breach of these agreements, which could materially adversely affect our ability to produce our products. Even if we are able to obtain and maintain product liability insurance, if a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage is made, then we may have to indemnify some or all of our manufacturers for their losses, which could materially deplete our assets. Employees As of December 31, 2011, we employed a total of 7 employees, 6 of whom were full time and 1 who is employed on a part time basis. We also have engaged 2 consultants on an ongoing basis. Of the 9 total employees and consultants, 2 are employed in a sales marketing customer support capacity, 3 in general and administrative and 4 in research and development. Gerald Kochanski, the Company Chief Financial Officer, served as the acting Chief Executive Officer from March 30, 2010 until April 5, 2010. Since April 6, 2010, Paul A. Mieyal, a member of the Board of Directors, has served as the acting Chief Executive Officer following the resignation of our former President and Chief Executive Officer on March 30, 2010. Dr. Mieyal is a Vice President of Wexford Capital LP, the managing member of Lambda Investors LLC, which is the beneficial owner of approximately 56% of the Company outstanding stock based on common stock and warrants held at December 31, 2011 Available Information We make available free of charge on our website ( http www.nephros.com ) our annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and all amendments to those reports, as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. We provide electronic or paper copies of filings free of charge upon request. The SEC maintains an Internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers that file with the SEC at http www.sec.gov . 22 Item 1A. Risk Factors Risks Related to Our Company Our independent registered public accountants, in their audit report related to our financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2011, expressed substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. Our independent registered public accounting firm has included an explanatory paragraph in their report on our financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K expressing doubt as to our ability to continue as a going concern. The accompanying financial statements have been prepared assuming that we will continue as a going concern, however, there can be no assurance that we will be able to do so. Our recurring losses and difficulty in generating sufficient cash flow to meet our obligations and sustain our operations, raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern, and our consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty. Based on our current cash flow projections, we will need to raise additional funds through either the licensing or sale of our technologies or the additional public or private offerings of our securities. However, there is no guarantee that we will be able to obtain further financing, or do so on reasonable terms. If we are unable to raise additional funds on a timely basis, or at all, we would be materially adversely affected. We have a history of operating losses and a significant accumulated deficit, and we may not achieve or maintain profitability in the future. We have not been profitable since our inception in 1997. As of December 31, 2011, we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $94,268,000 primarily as a result of historical operating losses. We expect to continue to incur additional losses for the foreseeable future as a result of a high level of operating expenses, significant up front expenditures including the cost of clinical trials, production and marketing activities and very limited revenue from the sale of our products. We began sales of our first product in March 2004, and we may never realize sufficient revenues from the sale of our products or be profitable. Each of the following factors, among others, may influence the timing and extent of our profitability, if any the completion and success of our regulatory approval processes and additional clinical trials for each of our ESRD therapy products in our target territories, including specifically our new 510(k) application for our HDF system; the market acceptance of HDF therapy in the United States and of our technologies and products in each of our target markets; our ability to effectively and efficiently manufacture, market and distribute our products; our ability to sell our products at competitive prices which exceed our per unit costs; and the consolidation of dialysis clinics into larger clinical groups. If we do not receive FDA approval for our OLpur H 2 H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 hemodiafilter our operations and our future business prospects will be significantly and adversely harmed. We have not received approval from the FDA for our OLpur H 2 H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 hemodiafilter. On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission, which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration, or HDF, system. On August 11, 2011 we submitted a new 510(k) application to market our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease. The application is subject to the FDA standard 90 day review period. The application details our OLpur MD220 diafilter and our OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module. Our OLpur MD220 is a dialyzer designed expressly for HDF therapy that employs our proprietary Mid Dilution diafiltration technology. Our OLpur H2H Hemodiafiltration module is designed to enable the most common types of standard dialysis machines to perform HDF therapy. On November 8, 2011 the Company received the initial FDA review of its new 510(k) application (K112314), which included a request for additional information. The Company provided answers to the FDA request in early February 2012 and awaits further communication from the FDA. Nephros believes that, if approved, its technology would be the first FDA approved on line HDF therapy available in the U.S. The prior decision by the U.S. FDA with regard to our HDF system does not impact our ability to market and sell our mid dilution (MD) filters for hemodiafiltration procedures outside of the U.S. We can give no assurance when or if our OLpur H 2 H hemodiafiltration module and OLpur MD220 hemodiafilter will be approved by the FDA. If we fail to ultimately receive FDA approval, our operations and our future business prospects would be significantly and adversely harmed. 23 We have limited experience selling our DSU water filtration system to dialysis clinics, and we might be unsuccessful in increasing our sales. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to sell our DSU water filtration system to hospitals and other healthcare facilities that include dialysis clinics. On July 1, 2009, we received approval from the FDA to market our DSU to dialysis clinics. We have limited experience at sales and marketing. If we are unsuccessful at manufacturing, marketing and selling our DSU, our operations and potential revenues might be adversely affected. Certain customers individually account for a large portion of our sales, and the loss of any of these customers could have a material adverse effect on our sales. For the year ended December 31, 2011, 1 of our customers accounted for 50% of our sales and another customer accounted for 21% of our sales. We believe that the loss of either of these customers would have a material adverse effect on our product sales, at least temporarily, while we seek to replace such customer and or self distribute in the territories currently served by such customer. We cannot sell our ESRD therapy products, including certain modifications thereto, until we obtain the requisite regulatory approvals and clearances in the countries in which we intend to sell our products. We have not obtained FDA approval for any of our ESRD therapy products, except for our HD190 filter, and cannot sell any of our other ESRD therapy products in the United States unless and until we obtain such approval. If we fail to receive, or experience a significant delay in receiving, such approvals and clearances then we may not be able to get our products to market and enhance our revenues. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to get our products into the market as quickly as possible. We obtained the Conformit Europ ene, or CE, mark, which demonstrates compliance with the relevant European Union requirements and is a regulatory prerequisite for selling our products in the European Union and certain other countries that recognize CE marking (collectively, European Community ), for our OLpur MDHDF filter series product in 2003 and received CE marking in November 2006 for our water filtration product, the Dual Stage Ultrafilter ( DSU ). We have not yet obtained the CE mark for any of our other products. Similarly, we cannot sell our ESRD therapy products in the United States until we receive FDA clearance. In addition to the pre market notification required pursuant to Section 510(k) of the FDC Act, the FDA could require us to obtain pre market approval of our ESRD therapy products under Section 515 of the FDC Act, either because of legislative or regulatory changes or because the FDA does not agree with our determination that we are eligible to use the Section 510(k) pre market notification process. The Section 515 pre market approval process is a significantly more costly, lengthy and uncertain approval process and could materially delay our products coming to market. If we do obtain clearance for marketing of any of our devices under Section 510(k) of the FDC Act, then any changes we wish to make to such device that could significantly affect safety and effectiveness will require clearance of a notification pursuant to Section 510(k), and we may need to submit clinical and manufacturing comparability data to obtain such approval or clearance. We could not market any such modified device until we received FDA clearance or approval. We cannot guarantee that the FDA would timely, if at all, clear or approve any modified product for which Section 510(k) is applicable. Failure to obtain timely clearance or approval for changes to marketed products would impair our ability to sell such products and generate revenues in the United States. The clearance and or approval processes in the European Community and in the United States can be lengthy and uncertain and each requires substantial commitments of our financial resources and our management time and effort. We may not be able to obtain further CE marking or any FDA approval for any of our ESRD therapy products in a timely manner or at all. Even if we do obtain regulatory approval, approval may be only for limited uses with specific classes of patients, processes or other devices. Our failure to obtain, or delays in obtaining, the necessary regulatory clearance and or approvals with respect to the European Community or the United States would prevent us from selling our affected products in these regions. If we cannot sell some of our products in these regions, or if we are delayed in selling while waiting for the necessary clearance and or approvals, our ability to generate revenues from these products will be limited. If we are successful in our initial marketing efforts in some or all of our Target European Market and the United States, then we plan to market our ESRD therapy products in several countries outside of our Target European Market and the United States, including Korea and China, Canada and Mexico. Requirements pertaining to the sale of medical devices vary widely from country to country. It may be very expensive and difficult for us to meet the requirements for the sale of our ESRD therapy products in many of these countries. As a result, we may not be able to obtain the required approvals in a timely manner, if at all. If we cannot sell our ESRD therapy products outside of our Target European Market and the United States, then the size of our potential market could be reduced, which would limit our potential sales and revenues. Clinical studies required for our ESRD therapy products are costly and time consuming, and their outcome is uncertain. Before obtaining regulatory approvals for the commercial sale of any of our ESRD therapy products in the United States and elsewhere, we must demonstrate through clinical studies that our products are safe and effective. 24 On June 30, 2010, we received a final decision letter from the FDA for our 510(k) submission which stated that the FDA could not reach a substantial equivalence determination for our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system. On August 11, 2011 we submitted a new 510(k) application to market our hemodiafiltration (HDF) system for end stage renal disease and we recently responded to an FDA request for additional information. For products other than those for which we have already received marketing approval, if we do not prove in clinical trials that our ESRD therapy products are safe and effective, we will not obtain marketing approvals from the FDA and other applicable regulatory authorities. In particular, 1 or more of our ESRD therapy products may not exhibit the expected medical benefits, may cause harmful side effects, may not be effective in treating dialysis patients or may have other unexpected characteristics that preclude regulatory approval for any or all indications of use or limit commercial use if approved. The length of time necessary to complete clinical trials varies significantly and is difficult to predict. Factors that can cause delay or termination of our clinical trials include slower than expected patient enrollment due to the nature of the protocol, the proximity of subjects to clinical sites, the eligibility criteria for the study, competition with clinical trials for similar devices or other factors; lower than expected retention rates of subjects in a clinical trial; inadequately trained or insufficient personnel at the study site to assist in overseeing and monitoring clinical trials; delays in approvals from a study site review board, or other required approvals; longer treatment time required to demonstrate effectiveness; lack of sufficient supplies of the ESRD therapy product; adverse medical events or side effects in treated subjects; and lack of effectiveness of the ESRD therapy product being tested. Even if we obtain positive results from clinical studies for our products, we may not achieve the same success in future studies of such products. Data obtained from clinical studies are susceptible to varying interpretations that could delay, limit or prevent regulatory approval. In addition, we may encounter delays or rejections based upon changes in FDA policy for device approval during the period of product development and FDA regulatory review of each submitted new device application. We may encounter similar delays in foreign countries. Moreover, regulatory approval may entail limitations on the indicated uses of the device. Failure to obtain requisite governmental approvals or failure to obtain approvals of the scope requested will delay or preclude our licensees or marketing partners from marketing our products or limit the commercial use of such products and will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, some or all of the clinical trials we undertake may not demonstrate sufficient safety and efficacy to obtain the requisite regulatory approvals, which could prevent or delay the creation of marketable products. Our product development costs will increase if we have delays in testing or approvals, if we need to perform more, larger or different clinical trials than planned or if our trials are not successful. Delays in our clinical trials may harm our financial results and the commercial prospects for our products. Additionally, we may be unable to complete our clinical trials if we are unable to obtain additional capital. We may be required to design and conduct additional clinical trials. We may be required to design and conduct additional clinical trials to further demonstrate the safety and efficacy of our ESRD therapy product, which may result in significant expense and delay. The FDA and foreign regulatory authorities may require new or additional clinical trials because of inconclusive results from current or earlier clinical trials, a possible failure to conduct clinical trials in complete adherence to FDA good clinical practice standards and similar standards of foreign regulatory authorities, the identification of new clinical trial endpoints, or the need for additional data regarding the safety or efficacy of our ESRD therapy products. It is possible that the FDA or foreign regulatory authorities may not ultimately approve our products for commercial sale in any jurisdiction, even if we believe future clinical results are positive. 25 We cannot assure you that our ESRD therapy products will be safe and we are required under applicable law to report any product related deaths or serious injuries or product malfunctions that could result in deaths or serious injuries, and such reports could trigger recalls, class action lawsuits and other events that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from such products. We cannot assure you that our ESRD therapy products will be safe. Under the FDC Act, we are required to submit medical device reports, or MDRs, to the FDA to report device related deaths, serious injuries and product malfunctions that could result in death or serious injury if they were to recur. Depending on their significance, MDRs could trigger events that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from such products, such as the following information contained in the MDRs could trigger FDA regulatory actions such as inspections, recalls and patient physician notifications; because the reports are publicly available, MDRs could become the basis for private lawsuits, including class actions; and if we fail to submit a required MDR to the FDA, the FDA could take enforcement action against us. If any of these events occur, then we could incur significant expenses and it could become more difficult for us to gain market acceptance of our ESRD therapy products and to generate revenues from sales. Other countries may impose analogous reporting requirements that could cause us to incur expenses and may also limit our ability to generate revenues from sales of our ESRD therapy products. Product liability associated with the production, marketing and sale of our products, and or the expense of defending against claims of product liability, could materially deplete our assets and generate negative publicity which could impair our reputation. The production, marketing and sale of kidney dialysis and water filtration products have inherent risks of liability in the event of product failure or claim of harm caused by product operation. Furthermore, even meritless claims of product liability may be costly to defend against. Although we have acquired product liability insurance in the amount of $5,000,000 for our products, we may not be able to maintain or obtain this insurance on acceptable terms or at all. Because we may not be able to obtain insurance that provides us with adequate protection against all potential product liability claims, a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage could materially deplete our assets. Moreover, even if we are able to obtain adequate insurance, any claim against us could generate negative publicity, which could impair our reputation and adversely affect the demand for our products, our ability to generate sales and our profitability. Some of the agreements that we may enter into with manufacturers of our products and comp1nts of our products may require us to obtain product liability insurance; or to indemnify manufacturers against liabilities resulting from the sale of our products. For example, the agreement with our contract manufacturer, or CM, requires that we obtain and maintain certain minimum product liability insurance coverage and that we indemnify our CM against certain liabilities arising out of our products that they manufacture, provided they do not arise out of our CM breach of the agreement, negligence or willful misconduct. If we are not able to obtain and maintain adequate product liability insurance, then we could be in breach of these agreements, which could materially adversely affect our ability to produce our products and generate revenues. Even if we are able to obtain and maintain product liability insurance, if a successful claim in excess of our insurance coverage is made, then we may have to indemnify some or all of our manufacturers for their losses, which could materially deplete our assets. If we violate any provisions of the FDC Act or any other statutes or regulations, then we could be subject to enforcement actions by the FDA or other governmental agencies. We face a significant compliance burden under the FDC Act and other applicable statutes and regulations which govern the testing, labeling, storage, record keeping, distribution, sale, marketing, advertising and promotion of our ESRD therapy products. If we violate the FDC Act or other regulatory requirements at any time during or after the product development and or approval process, we could be subject to enforcement actions by the FDA or other agencies, including fines; injunctions; civil penalties; 26 recalls or seizures of products; total or partial suspension of the production of our products; withdrawal of any existing approvals or pre market clearances of our products; refusal to approve or clear new applications or notices relating to our products; recommendations by the FDA that we not be allowed to enter into government contracts; and criminal prosecution. Any of the above could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Significant additional governmental regulation could subject us to unanticipated delays which would adversely affect our sales and revenues. Our business strategy depends in part on our ability to get our products into the market as quickly as possible. Additional laws and regulations, or changes to existing laws and regulations that are applicable to our business may be enacted or promulgated, and the interpretation, application or enforcement of the existing laws and regulations may change. We cannot predict the nature of any future laws, regulations, interpretations, applications or enforcements or the specific effects any of these might have on our business. Any future laws, regulations, interpretations, applications or enforcements could delay or prevent regulatory approval or clearance of our products and our ability to market our products. Moreover, changes that result in our failure to comply with the requirements of applicable laws and regulations could result in the types of enforcement actions by the FDA and or other agencies as described above, all of which could impair our ability to have manufactured and to sell the affected products. Access to the appropriations from the U.S. Department of Defense regarding the development of a dual stage water ultrafilter could be subject to unanticipated delays which could adversely affect our potential revenues. Our business strategy with respect to our DSU products depends in part on the successful development of DSU products for use by the military. Beginning in January 2008, we contracted with the U.S. Office of Naval Research to develop a personal potable water purification system for warfighters under a first contract in an amount not to exceed $866,000. In August 2009, we entered into a second contract with a value not to exceed $2 million. These contracts would utilize the Federal appropriations from the U.S. Department of Defense not to exceed $3 million that have been approved for this purpose. If there are unanticipated delays in receiving the appropriations from the U.S. Department of Defense, our operations and potential revenues may be adversely affected. Further, if we do not successfully complete the contract work or renew the contract work in the event that the research and development needs additional work to reach completion, our operations and potential revenues may be adversely affected. Protecting our intellectual property in our technology through patents may be costly and ineffective. If we are not able to adequately secure or enforce protection of our intellectual property, then we may not be able to compete effectively and we may not be profitable. Our future success depends in part on our ability to protect the intellectual property for our technology through patents. We will only be able to protect our products and methods from unauthorized use by third parties to the extent that our products and methods are covered by valid and enforceable patents or are effectively maintained as trade secrets. Our 16 granted U.S. patents will expire at various times from 2018 to 2026, assuming they are properly maintained. The protection provided by our patents, and patent applications if issued, may not be broad enough to prevent competitors from introducing similar products into the market. Our patents, if challenged or if we attempt to enforce them, may not necessarily be upheld by the courts of any jurisdiction. Numerous publications may have been disclosed by, and numerous patents may have been issued to, our competitors and others relating to methods and devices for dialysis of which we are not aware and additional patents relating to methods and devices for dialysis may be issued to our competitors and others in the future. If any of those publications or patents conflict with our patent rights, or cover our products, then any or all of our patent applications could be rejected and any or all of our granted patents could be invalidated, either of which could materially adversely affect our competitive position. Litigation and other proceedings relating to patent matters, whether initiated by us or a third party, can be expensive and time consuming, regardless of whether the outcome is favorable to us, and may require the diversion of substantial financial, managerial and other resources. An adverse outcome could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties or require us to cease any related development, product sales or commercialization activities. In addition, if patents that contain dominating or conflicting claims have been or are subsequently issued to others and the claims of these patents are ultimately determined to be valid, then we may be required to obtain licenses under patents of others in order to develop, manufacture, use, import and or sell our products. We may not be able to obtain licenses under any of these patents on terms acceptable to us, if at all. If we do not obtain these licenses, we could encounter delays in, or be prevented entirely from using, importing, developing, manufacturing, offering or selling any products or practicing any methods, or delivering any services requiring such licenses. 27 If we file patent applications or obtain patents in foreign countries, we will be subject to laws and procedures that differ from those in the United States. Such differences could create additional uncertainty about the level and extent of our patent protection. Moreover, patent protection in foreign countries may be different from patent protection under U.S. laws and may not be as favorable to us. Many non U.S. jurisdictions, for example, prohibit patent claims covering methods of medical treatment of humans, although this prohibition may not include devices used for such treatment. If we are not able to secure and enforce protection of our trade secrets through enforcement of our confidentiality and non competition agreements, then our competitors may gain access to our trade secrets, we may not be able to compete effectively and we may not be profitable. Such protection may be costly and ineffective. We attempt to protect our trade secrets, including the processes, concepts, ideas and documentation associated with our technologies, through the use of confidentiality agreements and non competition agreements with our current employees and with other parties to whom we have divulged such trade secrets. If these employees or other parties breach our confidentiality agreements and non competition agreements or if these agreements are not sufficient to protect our technology or are found to be unenforceable, then our competitors could acquire and use information that we consider to be our trade secrets and we may not be able to compete effectively. Policing unauthorized use of our trade secrets is difficult and expensive, particularly because of the global nature of our operations. The laws of other countries may not adequately protect our trade secrets. If our trademarks and trade names are not adequately protected, then we may not be able to build brand loyalty and our sales and revenues may suffer. Our registered or unregistered trademarks or trade names may be challenged, cancelled, infringed, circumvented or declared generic or determined to be infringing on other marks. We may not be able to protect our rights to these trademarks and trade names, which we need to build brand loyalty. Over the long term, if we are unable to establish a brand based on our trademarks and trade names, then we may not be able to compete effectively and our sales and revenues may suffer. If we are not able to successfully scale up production of our products, then our sales and revenues will suffer. In order to commercialize our products, we need to be able to produce them in a cost effective way on a large scale to meet commercial demand, while maintaining extremely high standards for quality and reliability. If we fail to successfully commercialize our products, then we will not be profitable. We expect to rely on a limited number of independent manufacturers to produce our OLpur MDHDF filter series and our other products, including the DSU. Our manufacturers systems and procedures may not be adequate to support our operations and may not be able to achieve the rapid execution necessary to exploit the market for our products. Our manufacturers could experience manufacturing and control problems as they begin to scale up our future manufacturing operations, if any, and we may not be able to scale up manufacturing in a timely manner or at a commercially reasonable cost to enable production in sufficient quantities. If we experience any of these problems with respect to our manufacturers initial or future scale ups of manufacturing operations, then we may not be able to have our products manufactured and delivered in a timely manner. Our products are new and evolving, and our manufacturers may encounter unforeseen difficulties in manufacturing them in commercial quantities or at all. We will not control the independent manufacturers of our products, which may affect our ability to deliver our products in a timely manner. If we are not able to ensure the timely delivery of our products, then potential customers may not order our products, and our sales and revenues would be adversely affected. Independent manufacturers of medical devices will manufacture all of our products and comp1nts. We have contracted with our CM to assemble and produce our products, including the DSU. As with any independent contractor, this manufacturer will not be employed or otherwise controlled by us and will be generally free to conduct their business at their own discretion. For us to compete successfully, among other things, our products must be manufactured on a timely basis in commercial quantities at costs acceptable to us. If 1 or more of our independent manufacturers fails to deliver our products in a timely manner, then we may not be able to find a substitute manufacturer. If we are not or if potential customers believe that we are not able to ensure timely delivery of our products, then potential customers may not order our products, and our sales and revenues would be adversely affected. 28 The loss or interruption of services of any of our manufacturers could slow or stop production of our products, which would limit our ability to generate sales and revenues. Because we are likely to rely on no more than 2 contract manufacturers to manufacture each of our products and major comp1nts of our products, a stop or significant interruption in the supply of our products or major comp1nts by a single manufacturer, for any reason, could have a material adverse effect on us. We expect most of our contract manufacturers will enter into contracts with us to manufacture our products and major comp1nts and that these contracts will be terminable by the contractors or us at any time under certain circumstances. We have not made alternative arrangements for the manufacture of our products or major comp1nts and we cannot be sure that acceptable alternative arrangements could be made on a timely basis, or at all, if 1 or more of our manufacturers failed to manufacture our products or major comp1nts in accordance with the terms of our arrangements. If any such failure occurs and we are unable to obtain acceptable alternative arrangements for the manufacture of our products or major comp1nts of our products, then the production and sale of our products could slow down or stop and our cash flow would suffer. If we are not able to maintain sufficient quality controls, then the approval or clearance of our ESRD therapy products by the European Union, the FDA or other relevant authorities could be delayed or denied and our sales and revenues will suffer. Approval or clearance of our ESRD therapy products could be delayed by the European Union, the FDA and the relevant authorities of other countries if our manufacturing facilities do not comply with their respective manufacturing requirements. The European Union imposes requirements on quality control systems of manufacturers, which are inspected and certified on a periodic basis and may be subject to additional unannounced inspections. Failure by our manufacturers to comply with these requirements could prevent us from marketing our ESRD therapy products in the European Community. The FDA also imposes requirements through quality system requirements, or QSR, regulations, which include requirements for good manufacturing practices, or GMP. Failure by our manufacturers to comply with these requirements could prevent us from obtaining FDA approval of our ESRD therapy products and from marketing such products in the United States. Although the manufacturing facilities and processes that we use to manufacture our OLpur MDHDF filter series have been inspected and certified by a worldwide testing and certification agency (also referred to as a notified body) that performs conformity assessments to European Union requirements for medical devices, they have not been inspected by the FDA. Similarly, although some of the facilities and processes that we expect to use to manufacture our OLpur H 2 H and OLpur NS2000 have been inspected by the FDA, they have not been inspected by any notified body. A notified body is a group accredited and monitored by governmental agencies that inspects manufacturing facilities and quality control systems at regular intervals and is authorized to carry out unannounced inspections. We cannot be sure that any of the facilities or processes we use will comply or continue to comply with their respective requirements on a timely basis or at all, which could delay or prevent our obtaining the approvals we need to market our products in the European Community and the United States. To market our ESRD therapy products in the European Community, the United States and other countries, where approved, manufacturers of such products must continue to comply or ensure compliance with the relevant manufacturing requirements. Although we cannot control the manufacturers of our ESRD therapy products, we may need to expend time, resources and effort in product manufacturing and quality control to assist with their continued compliance with these requirements. If violations of applicable requirements are noted during periodic inspections of the manufacturing facilities of our manufacturers, then we may not be able to continue to market the ESRD therapy products manufactured in such facilities and our revenues may be materially adversely affected. If our products are commercialized, we may face significant challenges in obtaining market acceptance of such products, which could adversely affect our potential sales and revenues. Our products are new to the market, and we do not yet have an established market or customer base for our products. Acceptance of our ESRD therapy products in the marketplace by both potential users, including ESRD patients, and potential purchasers, including nephrologists, dialysis clinics and other health care providers, is uncertain, and our failure to achieve sufficient market acceptance will significantly limit our ability to generate revenue and be profitable. Market acceptance will require substantial marketing efforts and the expenditure of significant funds by us to inform dialysis patients and nephrologists, dialysis clinics and other health care providers of the benefits of using our ESRD therapy products. We may encounter significant clinical and market resistance to our products and our products may never achieve market acceptance. We may not be able to build key relationships with physicians, clinical groups and government agencies, pursue or increase sales opportunities in Europe or elsewhere, or be the first to introduce hemodiafiltration therapy in the United States. Product orders may be cancelled, patients or customers currently using our products may cease to do so and patients or customers expected to begin using our products may not. Factors that may affect our ability to achieve acceptance of our ESRD therapy products in the marketplace include whether such products will be safe for use; such products will be effective; such products will be cost effective; we will be able to demonstrate product safety, efficacy and cost effectiveness; there are unexpected side effects, complications or other safety issues associated with such products; and 29 government or third party reimbursement for the cost of such products is available at reasonable rates, if at all. Acceptance of our water filtration products in the marketplace is also uncertain, and our failure to achieve sufficient market acceptance and sell such products at competitive prices will limit our ability to generate revenue and be profitable. Our water filtration products and technologies may not achieve expected reliability, performance and endurance standards. Our water filtration products and technology may not achieve market acceptance, including among hospitals, or may not be deemed suitable for other commercial, military, industrial or retail applications. Many of the same factors that may affect our ability to achieve acceptance of our ESRD therapy products in the marketplace will also apply to our water filtration products, except for those related to side effects, clinical trials and third party reimbursement. If we cannot develop adequate distribution, customer service and technical support ne2rks, then we may not be able to market and distribute our products effectively and or customers may decide not to order our products, and, in either case, our sales and revenues will suffer. Our strategy requires us to distribute our products and provide a significant amount of customer service and maintenance and other technical service. To provide these services, we have begun, and will need to continue, to develop a ne2rk of distribution and a staff of employees and independent contractors in each of the areas in which we intend to operate. We cannot assure you we will be able to organize and manage this ne2rk on a cost effective basis. If we cannot effectively organize and manage this ne2rk, then it may be difficult for us to distribute our products and to provide competitive service and support to our customers, in which case customers may be unable, or decide not, to order our products and our sales and revenues will suffer. We may face significant risks associated with international operations, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We expect to manufacture and to market our products in our Target European Market and elsewhere outside of the United States. We expect that our revenues from our Target European Market will initially account for a significant portion of our revenues. Our international operations are subject to a number of risks, including the following fluctuations in exchange rates of the United States dollar could adversely affect our results of operations; we may face difficulties in enforcing and collecting accounts receivable under some countries legal systems; local regulations may restrict our ability to sell our products, have our products manufactured or conduct other operations; political instability could disrupt our operations; some governments and customers may have longer payment cycles, with resulting adverse effects on our cash flow; and some countries could impose additional taxes or restrict the import of our products. Any 1 or more of these factors could increase our costs, reduce our revenues, or disrupt our operations, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we are unable to keep our key management and scientific personnel, then we are likely to face significant delays at a critical time in our corporate development and our business is likely to be damaged. Our success depends upon the skills, experience and efforts of our management and other key personnel certain members of our scientific and engineering staff and our marketing executives. As a relatively new company, much of our corporate, scientific and technical knowledge is concentrated in the hands of these few individuals. We do not maintain key man life insurance on any of our management or other key personnel. The loss of the services of 1 or more of our present management or other key personnel could significantly delay the development and or launch of our products as there could be a learning curve of several months or more for any replacement personnel. Furthermore, competition for the type of highly skilled individuals we require is intense and we may not be able to attract and retain new employees of the caliber needed to achieve our objectives. Failure to replace key personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and operations. 30 Risks Related to the ESRD Therapy Industry We expect to face significant competition from existing suppliers of renal replacement therapy devices, supplies and services. If we are not able to compete with them effectively, then we may not be profitable. We expect to compete in the ESRD therapy market with existing suppliers of hemodialysis and perit1al dialysis devices, supplies and services. Our competitors include Fresenius Medical Care AG and Gambro AB, currently 2 of the primary machine manufacturers in hemodialysis, as well as B. Braun Biotech International GmbH, and Nikkiso Corporation and other smaller machine manufacturers in hemodialysis. B. Braun Biotech International GmbH, Fresenius Medical Care AG, Gambro AB and Nikkiso Corporation also manufacture HDF machines. These companies and most of our other competitors have longer operating histories and substantially greater financial, marketing, technical, manufacturing and research and development resources and experience than we have. Our competitors could use these resources and experiences to develop products that are more effective or less costly than any or all of our products or that could render any or all of our products obsolete. Our competitors could also use their economic strength to influence the market to continue to buy their existing products. We do not have a significant established customer base and may encounter a high degree of competition in further developing 1 Our potential customers are a limited number of nephrologists, national, regional and local dialysis clinics and other healthcare providers. The number of our potential customers may be further limited to the extent any exclusive relationships exist or are entered into between our potential customers and our competitors. We cannot assure you that we will be successful in marketing our products to these potential customers. If we are not able to develop competitive products and take and hold sufficient market share from our competitors, we will not be profitable. Some of our competitors own or could acquire dialysis clinics throughout the United States, our Target European Market and other regions of the world. We may not be able to successfully market our products to the dialysis clinics under their ownership. If our potential market is materially reduced in this manner, then our potential sales and revenues could be materially reduced. Some of our competitors, including Fresenius Medical Care AG and Gambro AB, manufacture their own products and own dialysis clinics in the United States, our Target European Market and or other regions of the world. In 2005, Gambro AB divested its U.S. dialysis clinics to DaVita, Inc. and entered a preferred, but not exclusive, ten year supplier arrangement with DaVita, Inc., whereby DaVita, Inc. will purchase a significant amount of renal products and supplies from Gambro AB Renal Products. Because these competitors have historically tended to use their own products in their clinics, we may not be able to successfully market our products to the dialysis clinics under their ownership. According to the Fresenius Medical Care AG Form 20 F filed February 23, 2011, Fresenius Medical Care AG provides treatment in its own dialysis clinics to 214,648 patients in its 2,757 facilities around the world including facilities located in the North America. According to a DaVita, Inc. February 4, 2011 press release, as of September 30, 2010, DaVita, Inc. provided treatment in 1,598 outpatient dialysis centers serving approximately 124,000 patients in the United States. We believe that there is currently a trend among ESRD therapy providers towards greater consolidation. If such consolidation takes the form of our competitors acquiring independent dialysis clinics, rather than such dialysis clinics banding together in independent chains, then more of our potential customers would also be our competitors. If our competitors continue to grow their ne2rks of dialysis clinics, whether organically or through consolidation, and if we cannot successfully market our products to dialysis clinics owned by these competitors or any other competitors and do not acquire clinics ourselves, then our revenues could be adversely affected. If the size of the potential market for our products is significantly reduced due to pharmacological or technological advances in preventative and alternative treatments for ESRD, then our potential sales and revenues will suffer. Pharmacological or technological advances in preventative or alternative treatments for ESRD could significantly reduce the number of ESRD patients needing our products. These pharmacological or technological advances may include the development of new medications, or improvements to existing medications, which help to delay the onset or prevent the progression of ESRD in high risk patients (such as those with diabetes and hypertension); the development of new medications, or improvements in existing medications, which reduce the incidence of kidney transplant rejection; and developments in the use of kidneys harvested from genetically engineered animals as a source of transplants. If these or any other pharmacological or technological advances reduce the number of patients needing treatment for ESRD, then the size of the market for our products may be reduced and our potential sales and revenues will suffer. 31 If government and other third party reimbursement programs discontinue their coverage of ESRD treatment or reduce reimbursement rates for ESRD products, then we may not be able to sell as many units of our ESRD therapy products as otherwise expected, or we may need to reduce the anticipated prices of such products and, in either case, our potential revenues may be reduced. Providers of renal replacement therapy are often reimbursed by government programs, such as Medicare or Medicaid in the United States, or other third party reimbursement programs, such as private medical care plans and insurers. We believe that the amount of reimbursement for renal replacement therapy under these programs has a significant impact on the decisions of nephrologists, dialysis clinics and other health care providers regarding treatment methods and products. Accordingly, changes in the extent of coverage for renal replacement therapy or a reduction in the reimbursement rates under any or all of these programs may cause a decline in recommendations or purchases of our products, which would materially adversely affect the market for our products and reduce our potential sales. Alternatively, we might respond to reduced reimbursement rates by reducing the prices of our products, which could also reduce our potential revenues. As the number of managed health care plans increases in the United States, amounts paid for our ESRD therapy products by non governmental programs may decrease and we may not generate sufficient revenues to be profitable. We expect to obtain a portion of our revenues from reimbursement provided by non governmental programs in the United States. Although non governmental programs generally pay higher reimbursement rates than governmental programs, of the non governmental programs, managed care plans generally pay lower reimbursement rates than insurance plans. Reliance on managed care plans for dialysis treatment may increase if future changes to the Medicare program require non governmental programs to assume a greater percentage of the total cost of care given to dialysis patients over the term of their illness, or if managed care plans otherwise significantly increase their enrollment of these patients. If the reliance on managed care plans for dialysis treatment increases, more patients join managed care plans or managed care plans reduce reimbursement rates, we may need to reduce anticipated prices of our ESRD therapy products or sell fewer units, and, in either case, our potential revenues would suffer. If HDF does not become a preferred therapy for ESRD, then the market for our ESRD therapy products may be limited and we may not be profitable. A significant portion of our success is dependent on the acceptance and implementation of HDF as a preferred therapy for ESRD. There are several treatment options currently available and others may be developed. HDF may not increase in acceptance as a preferred therapy for ESRD. If it does not, then the market for our ESRD therapy products may be limited and we may not be able to sell a sufficient quantity of our products to be profitable. If the per treatment costs for dialysis clinics using our ESRD therapy products are higher than the costs of clinics providing hemodialysis treatment, then we may not achieve market acceptance of our ESRD therapy products in the United States and our potential sales and revenues will suffer. If the cost of our ESRD therapy products results in an increased cost to the dialysis clinic over hemodialysis therapies and such cost is not separately reimbursable by governmental programs or private medical care plans and insurers outside of the per treatment fee, then we may not gain market acceptance for such products in the United States unless HDF therapy becomes the standard treatment method for ESRD. If we do not gain market acceptance for our ESRD therapy products in the United States, then the size of our market and our anticipated sales and revenues will be reduced. Proposals to modify the health care system in the United States or other countries could affect the pricing of our products. If we cannot sell our products at the prices we plan to, then our margins and our profitability will be adversely affected. A substantial portion of the cost of treatment for ESRD in the United States is currently reimbursed by the Medicare program at prescribed rates. Proposals to modify the current health care system in the United States to improve access to health care and control its costs are continually being considered by the federal and state governments. In March 2010, the U.S. Congress passed landmark healthcare legislation. We cannot predict what impact on federal reimbursement policies this legislation will have in general or on our business specifically. We anticipate that the U.S. Congress and state legislatures will continue to review and assess this legislation and possibly alternative health care reform proposals. We cannot predict whether new proposals will be made or adopted, when they may be adopted or what impact they may have on us if they are adopted. Any spending decreases or other significant changes in the Medicare program could affect the pricing of our ESRD therapy products. As we are not yet established in our business and it will take some time for us to begin to recoup our research and development costs, our profit margins are likely initially to be lower than those of our competitors and we may be more vulnerable to small decreases in price than many of our competitors. Health administration authorities in countries other than the United States may not provide reimbursement for our products at rates sufficient for us to achieve profitability, or at all. Like the United States, these countries have considered health care reform proposals and could materially alter their government sponsored health care programs by reducing reimbursement rates for dialysis products. Any reduction in reimbursement rates under Medicare or foreign health care programs could negatively affect the pricing of our ESRD therapy products. If we are not able to charge a sufficient amount for our products, then our margins and our profitability will be adversely affected. 32 If patients in our Target European Market were to reuse dialyzers, then our potential product sales could be materially adversely affected. In the United States, a majority of dialysis clinics reuse dialyzers that is, a single dialyzer is disinfected and reused by the same patient. However, the trend in our Target European Market is towards not reusing dialyzers, and some countries (such as France, Germany, Italy and the Netherlands) actually forbid the reuse of dialyzers. As a result, each patient in our Target European Market can generally be expected to purchase more dialyzers than each United States patient. The laws forbidding reuse could be repealed and it may become generally accepted to reuse dialyzers in our Target European Market, just as it currently is in the United States. If reuse of dialyzers were to become more common among patients in our Target European Market, then there would be demand for fewer dialyzer units and our potential product sales could be materially adversely affected. Risks Related to Our Common Stock and Warrants There currently is a limited market for our common stock. Our common stock is quoted on the Over the Counter, or OTC, Bulletin Board. Prior to January 22, 2009, our common stock was listed on the AMEX. Trading in our common stock on both AMEX and the OTC Bulletin Board has been very limited, which could affect the price of our stock. We have no plans, proposals, arrangements or understandings with any person with regard to the development of an active trading market for our common stock, and no assurance can be given that an active trading market will develop. The prices at which shares of our common stock trade have been and will likely continue to be volatile. In the 2 years ended December 31, 2011, our common stock has traded at prices ranging from a high of $240 to a low of $0.30 per share, after giving effect to the 120 reverse stock split effected on March 11, 2011 Due to the lack of an active market for our common stock, you should expect the prices at which our common stock might trade to continue to be highly volatile. The expected volatile price of our stock will make it difficult to predict the value of your investment, to sell your shares at a profit at any given time, or to plan purchases and sales in advance. A variety of other factors might also affect the market price of our common stock. These include, but are not limited to achievement or rejection of regulatory approvals by our competitors or us, including specifically our 510(k) application to the FDA for our HDF system; publicity regarding actual or potential clinical or regulatory results relating to products under development by our competitors or us; delays or failures in initiating, completing or analyzing clinical trials or the unsatisfactory design or results of these trials; announcements of technological innovations or new commercial products by our competitors or us; developments concerning proprietary rights, including patents; regulatory developments in the United States and foreign countries; economic or other crises and other external factors; period to period fluctuations in our results of operations; changes in financial estimates by securities analysts; and sales of our common stock. We are not able to control many of these factors, and we believe that period to period comparisons of our financial results will not necessarily be indicative of our future performance. In addition, the stock market in general, and the market for biotechnology companies in particular, has experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations in recent years that might have been unrelated or disproportionate to the operating performance of individual companies. These broad market and industry factors might seriously harm the market price of our common stock, regardless of our operating performance. 33 The market price of our common stock may fall below the exercise price of the warrants issued in connection with the rights offering. The warrants are currently exercisable and will expire on March 10, 2016. The market price of our common stock may fall below the exercise price for these warrants prior to their expiration. Any warrants not exercised by their date of expiration will expire worthless and we will be under no further obligation to the holders of warrants. If an effective registration is not in place and a current prospectus is not available when an investor desires to exercise warrants, such investor may be unable to exercise his, her or its warrants, causing such warrants to expire worthless. We will not be obligated to issue shares of common stock upon exercise of warrants unless, at the time such holder seeks to exercise such warrant, we have a registration statement under the Securities Act in effect covering the shares of common stock issuable upon the exercise of the warrants and a current prospectus relating to the common stock. We intend to use our best efforts to keep a registration statement in effect covering shares of common stock issuable upon exercise of the warrants and to maintain a current prospectus relating to the common stock issuable upon exercise of the warrants until the expiration of the warrants. However, we cannot assure you that we will be able to do so, and if we do not maintain a current prospectus related to the common stock issuable upon exercise of the warrants, holders will be unable to exercise their warrants and we will not be required to settle any such warrant exercise. If the prospectus relating to the common stock issuable upon the exercise of the warrants is not current, the warrants held by public stockholders may have no value, we will have no obligation to settle the warrants for cash, the market for such warrants may be limited, such warrants may expire worthless and, as a result, an investor may have paid the full price solely for the shares of common stock included in the Units. An investor will only be able to exercise a warrant if the issuance of common stock upon such exercise has been registered or qualified or is deemed exempt under the securities laws of the state of residence of the holder of the warrants. No warrants will be exercisable and we will not be obligated to issue shares of common stock unless the shares of common stock issuable upon such exercise have been registered or qualified or deemed to be exempt under the securities laws of the state of residence of the holder of the warrants. Because the exemptions from qualification in certain states for resales of warrants and for issuances of common stock by the issuer upon exercise of a warrant may be different, a warrant may be held by a holder in a state where an exemption is not available for issuance of common stock upon an exercise and the holder will be precluded from exercise of the warrant. As a result, the warrants may be deprived of any value, the market for the warrants may be limited, the holders of the warrants may not be able to exercise their warrants and they may expire worthless if the common stock issuable upon such exercise is not qualified or exempt from qualification in the jurisdictions in which the holders of the warrants reside. We have never paid dividends and do not intend to pay cash dividends. We have never paid dividends on our common stock and currently do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future. Consequently, any returns on an investment in our common stock in the foreseeable future will have to come from an increase in the value of the stock itself. As noted above, the lack of an active trading market for our common stock will make it difficult to value and sell our common stock. While our dividend policy will be based on the operating results and capital needs of our business, it is anticipated that all earnings, if any, will be retained to finance our future operations. Because we are subject to the penny stock rules, you may have difficulty in selling our common stock. Our common stock is subject to regulations of the SEC relating to the market for penny stocks. Penny stock, as defined by the Penny Stock Reform Act, is any equity security not traded on a national securities exchange that has a market price of less than $5.00 per share. The penny stock regulations generally require that a disclosure schedule explaining the penny stock market and the risks associated therewith be delivered to purchasers of penny stocks and impose various sales practice requirements on broker dealers who sell penny stocks to persons other than established customers and accredited investors. The broker dealer must make a suitability determination for each purchaser and receive the purchaser written agreement prior to the sale. In addition, the broker dealer must make certain mandated disclosures, including the actual sale or purchase price and actual bid offer quotations, as well as the compensation to be received by the broker dealer and certain associated persons. The regulations applicable to penny stocks may severely affect the market liquidity for your common stock and could limit your ability to sell your securities in the secondary market. Our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, limits liability of our directors and officers, which could discourage you or other stockholders from bringing suits against our directors or officers in circumstances where you think they might otherwise be warranted. Our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, provides, with specific exceptions required by Delaware law, that our directors are not personally liable to us or our stockholders for m1tary damages for any action or failure to take any action. In addition, we have agreed to, and our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, and our second amended and restated bylaws provide for, mandatory indemnification of directors and officers to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law. These provisions may discourage stockholders from bringing suit against a director or officer for breach of duty and may reduce the likelihood of derivative litigation brought by stockholders on our behalf against any of our directors or officers. 34 We may use our financial resources in ways with which you do not agree and in ways that may not yield a favorable return. Our management has broad discretion over the use of our financial resources, including the net proceeds from all of our equity financings. Stockholders may not deem such uses desirable. Our use of our financial resources may vary substantially from our currently planned uses. We cannot assure you that we will apply such proceeds effectively or that we will invest such proceeds in a manner that will yield a favorable return or any return at all. Several provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, and our second amended and restated bylaws could discourage, delay or prevent a merger or acquisition, which could adversely affect the market price of our common stock. Several provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law, our fourth amended and restated certificate of incorporation, as amended, and our second amended and restated bylaws could discourage, delay or prevent a merger or acquisition that stockholders may consider favorable, and the market price of our common stock could be reduced as a result. These provisions include authorizing our board of directors to issue blank check preferred stock without stockholder approval; providing for a classified board of directors with staggered, 3 year terms; prohibiting us from engaging in a business combination with an interested stockholder for a period of 3 years after the date of the transaction in which the person became an interested stockholder unless certain provisions are met; prohibiting cumulative voting in the election of directors; limiting the persons who may call special meetings of stockholders; and establishing advance notice requirements for nominations for election to our board of directors or for proposing matters that can be acted on by stockholders at stockholder meetings. As a relatively new company with little or no name recognition and with several risks and uncertainties that could impair our business operations, we are not likely to generate widespread interest in our common stock. Without widespread interest in our common stock, our common stock price may be highly volatile and an investment in our common stock could decline in value. Unlike many companies with publicly traded securities, we have little or no name recognition in the investment community. We are a relatively new company and very few investors are familiar with either our company or our products. We do not have an active trading market in our common stock, and 1 might never develop, or if it does develop, might not continue. Additionally, the market price of our common stock may fluctuate significantly in response to many factors, many of which are beyond our control. Risks and uncertainties, including those described elsewhere in this Certain Risks and Uncertainties section could impair our business operations or otherwise cause our operating results or prospects to be below expectations of investors and market analysts, which could adversely affect the market price of our common stock. As a result, investors in our common stock may not be able to resell their shares at or above their purchase price and could lose all of their investment. Securities class action litigation is often brought against public companies following periods of volatility in the market price of such company securities. As a result, we may become subject to this type of litigation in the future. Litigation of this type could be extremely expensive and divert management attention and resources from running our company. If we fail to maintain an effective system of internal controls over financial reporting, we may not be able to accurately report our financial results, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and the market value of our securities. Effective internal controls over financial reporting are necessary for us to provide reliable financial reports. If we cannot provide reliable financial reports, our reputation and operating results may be harmed. If management is unable to express a favorable opinion on the effectiveness of our internal controls, we could lose investor confidence in the accuracy and completeness of our financial reports. Any failure to achieve and maintain effective internal controls could have an adverse effect on our business, financial position and results of operations. 35 Our directors, executive officers and Lambda Investors LLC control a significant portion of our stock and, if they choose to vote together, could have sufficient voting power to control the vote on substantially all corporate matters. As of December 31, 2011, our directors, executive officers and Lambda Investors LLC, our largest stockholder, beneficially owned approximately 56% of our outstanding common stock. As a result of this ownership, Lambda Investors has the ability to exert significant influence over our policies and affairs, including the election of directors. Lambda Investors, whether acting al1 or acting with other stockholders, could have the power to elect all of our directors and to control the vote on substantially all other corporate matters without the approval of other stockholders. Furthermore, such concentration of voting power could enable Lambda Investors LLC, whether acting al1 or acting with other stockholders, to delay or prevent another party from taking control of our company even where such change of control transaction might be desirable to other stockholders. The interests of Lambda Investors in any matter put before the stockholders may differ from those of any other stockholder. Future sales of our common stock could cause the market price of our common stock to decline. The market price of our common stock could decline due to sales of a large number of shares in the market, including sales of shares by Lambda Investors or any other large stockholder, or the perception that such sales could occur. These sales could also make it more difficult or impossible for us to sell equity securities in the future at a time and price that we deem appropriate to raise funds through future offerings of common stock. Prior to our initial public offering we entered into registration rights agreements with many of our existing security holders that entitled them to have an aggregate of 501,012 shares registered for sale in the public market. Moreover, many of those shares, as well as the 9,213 shares we sold to Asahi Kasei Medical Co. Ltd., could be sold in the public market without registration once they have been held for 1 year, subject to the limitations of Rule 144 under the Securities Act. In addition, we entered into a registration rights agreement with the holders of our New Notes pursuant to which we granted the holders certain registration rights with respect to the shares of common stock issuable upon conversion of the New Notes and upon exercise of the Class D Warrants. We also entered into a registration rights agreement with Lambda Investors pursuant to which we will register for resale the 3,009,711 shares of common stock and 2,782,579 shares of common stock issuable upon the exercise of warrant purchased by Lambda Investors on March 10, 2011 in a private placement.
